Authorities said they were forced take action after the creature's attacks on terrified river users intensified over the past three weeks.
The best tribute we can give is to live our lives fully, completely. Just get out there. Accomplish our dreams. Live well. Appreciate life, and love every day we are given.
Dr. Chickenhiemer clucked, flapped his wings, and made a wild dash for the large dark opening in the cave wall. However, it was not to be. Dr. Chickenhiemer was probably the least lucky of all chickens.
but as I went last year and the year before,
(her foal as a yearling)
This is what we trash on a daily basis. This what we berate, and in doing so we demonstrate our negativity. Our inability to break a mindset even in the face of overwhelming evidence to the contrary. It is this mindest we have to break if we are ever to have a chance at a decent future.
So we must understand the mercurial.
It was always very cute when a clutch hatched out. Little fluffy things chirping, running around in dizzy circles. Hens aren't particularly clever and they all imagined the little ones were there own, so we might end up with ten chicks and eleven mothers at once.
My first one has students measuring classroom items with their egg ruler...so cute!!!
I do recommend this book if you like the whole idea of voodoo and what a person who suddenly becomes invisible might do. However, I feel I must warn most that the novel is very graphic both in the death and rape scenes so if you are squeamish or prone to nightmares, you might want to skip this one. I give the book a solid B.
But for the gardener, cherry tomatoes are hard to beat. The plants are highly productive even in our hottest weather when full-sized tomatoes are impossible to grow. Cherry tomatoes are available in many varieties that resist both disease and insect attacks, and they ripen to perfection on the vine without splitting, rotting or dropping. Available in several sizes and colors, some of our favorite varieties are "Matt's Wild Cherry" (the tiniest and sweetest cherry tomato we've grown), "Yellow Pear" (which produces a ridiculous number of beautiful yellow tear-drop shaped tomatoes) and "Sugary" (which is an unusual oblong shape and pretty pink color).
Unfortunately, he wasn't a great baseball player after he turned 27. He got hurt, played through pain and on dreadful teams, lost most of the thump in his bat -- he hit just .292 and slugged just .424 after his 27th birthday.
Scones! Jam! Pot of tea! Lovely!
Following last year‘s successful inaugural staging at MOSI, the LEGO Show is back this year in what promises to be a bigger and better event.
We have still continued to try to get pregnant with the exception of one month (more on that later). I felt at times that a break might have been important for us emotionally, so I cut back on some other stressful things to find enough balance to get by. I stopped teaching spinning classes for a while, but I’ll be returning to those later this month. It was a welcome reprieve, but I have really missed the designated exercise time in my schedule. I know I need that again. The largest project of my career launched in December and that is finally beginning to run smoothly and quiet down now as well.
What do you think Betty Freidan–or Betty Draper for that matter–might say to the idea that, come 2010, women everywhere would be finding their purpose right in their own backyards? Tending to the chicken coops in their own backyards, that is?
They had lives before this and now there is just ruin.
“Three hours in bed? I don’t get it – why can’t you do whatever you have to do at the kitchen table?”
African men do not appreciate miniskirts unless worn by Koinange Street Women. Wear a decent dress or a long skirt far below the elbow.
The sweet mellow flavor of cabbage leaves gets coated with batter and pan fry them. A wonderful snack or lunch on a rainy day for me.
I was struck by her accent, but that’s not all. She got ahold of my brother first and hugged him like she was wrestling a bear. And then, Oh Dear God, she pinched his cheeks.
An idea put around a few years ago was for the pub to be removed to St Fagans Musuem, other heritage sites such as Ironbridge Gorge Museum have their own pubs and its been rumoured that St Fagans have been looking around for one for years. As the pub is no longer viable and the students opposite are not using the pub, surely the best option now is to see the building rebuilt at the museum where future generations may be able to experience it for themselves, rather than being just another demolished Cardiff pub?
20. What was the last healthy thing you did?
Note how they emphasize felony convictions, so they can keep Ted from owning a gun ever again, and keep this gunsmith from working in his chosen career. Remember the argument that every day everyone of us violates three federal laws? That Mens Rea is no longer being used to decide prosecution?
There are days when I feel like I'm living in a holiday diorama. Already. Complete with fake cheer. Well, I needed some real cheer, a little laughter and a bright light today, all of which Rachel has in spades. This memory is special to me and always gives me chuckle even when I don't want to laugh. This and Pumpkin Cheesecake? I'm set and good to go. Bring on the wonder:
What if you exploit it
So, to whoever was watching over my boy this morning...
Dec. of 2009 my brother, Bryce, noticed that my neck had a bulge on my left side. Considering he is specializing as a Maxillofacial Surgeon, it's not surprising that he noticed it and I never did. He told me that I needed to get it checked out, so that I did. Jan. 2010 I went to my primary doctor and did blood work for my thyroid. It all came back fine. Feb. I had an ultrasound which mainly just showed that my left thyroid was very very large. March I had a biopsy (horrible thing to have done especially if you have bad experiences with needles) and in April I found out the results were benign. I thought I should go to a specialist, but my doctor told me I didn't need to and everything looked fine. He said it didn't matter that it was so large. I was supposed to go back the next year. Well that next year I was going to go back then ended up getting pregnant, was horribly sick with the pregnancy and then lost the baby at 18 weeks (which I have been told by all my Doctors that my thyroid and now cancer was not the reason for losing the baby). My point is that I didn't end up going into the doctor that year because of all that went on with me. So Jan. of this year I made an appointment with my primary doctor and told them I was coming in for a referral. I didn't want to be told that I didn't need to go to a specialist. I was told by SO many other people that I certainly DID need to go to a specialist, and I felt I needed to, so I finally took matters into my own hands.
I see here that I’ve floated into the “‘Religious’ But Not Attending” realm as well, but I think that there’s sufficient relation between them that it makes sense to include them as well.
** I love going out (for a stroll, for dinner, for movies, for brunch, for anything...) and according to my husband, it is best to take me out when I am unwell, because I am perfectly cured as soon as I step out!
For Israel, the trading of live terrorists with blood on their hands for the dead bodies of two Israeli soldiers endangers the life of every Israeli captured by the Arabs, including Gilad Shalit, who is still a prisoner of Hamas. After all,why should Hezbollah or any other Arab captor return a live Jew when they can get such a handsome price for a dead one?
I’ve also just spent the last 5 minutes putting the new Nicki Minaj album onto my laptop computer. I finally got round to doing it. From there, I’m gonna put them on my iPod machine. And speaking of iPod’s, I think I have sonic power. I’ll tell you why. I literally just went to check the weather forecast, to see what I would need to pack for PE tomorrow, and just as I saw that it said it would be raining, it started raining outside. Freaky deaky doo dah.
Opening and synopsis:
Now I am faced with an absolute explosion of music from Spiers & Boden, Rachael McShane, Chavo, Belshazzar’s Feast, Faustus and Benji Kirkpatrick. Faustus lead me to the original manifestation of the band Dr. Faustus and Rachael McShane lead me to explore an event from the Shrewsbury Folk festival of 2009 called ‘The Darwin Song Project’.
You gotta know that
You Can Depend on Me, Fletcher Henderson and His Orchestra
October 30 – Austin, Fiesta Gardens
Merveilleuse cité
Doubtlessly, most anime and manga fans are familiar with the original Neon Genesis Evangelion’s story. Angelic Days share the basic plot – teenagers are chosen to pilot giant robots and learn about growing up in the process – but little else. There’s none of the weirdness that you might expect, and certainly none of the depth. All the story really has to offer is a straightforward tale about kids and giant robots. It still has some of the mystery that comes with the mecha genre, but nothing about the plot stands out, especially when you remember that the original Eva did it better.
If the lump you feel moves by itself, without the rest of the baby’s body re-situating inside your belly, then that lump is probably the baby’s head, which moves independently of the rest of the baby’s body.
If this series is well received and there is enough interest I am hoping to create a Design for Writers newsletter/e-zine where I can really get into the Elements, Principles and Techniques of Design and how they SPECIFICALLY relate to writers. I would have in-depth monthly articles specific to cover AND author brand design. I would analyze existing authors cover designs, websites/blogs, and overall brands and answer questions from readers.
When I was a girl, we had to make a weekly visit to my grandparents. Grandma and Grandpa lived out in the country, in the same house they raised four girls and four boys. They were farmers, and their nearest neighbors were I don't know how far away. We could see the houses beyond the cornfields when we were driving along the road, and to my child's eye they seemed miles away. When we pulled into the driveway, my mom would remind me not to go too far back into the corn. (I was known for getting lost, even then.) I think the most I ever went back was four or five rows. I don't think I ever got seriously lost, though late one night, when my brother and sister and I spent the night at Grandma and Grandpa's, everyone went out looking for me anyway. Turned out I had burrowed deep into the covers my brother and sister had thrown off (I was really tiny), and no one found me until my brother accidentally stepped on me. He'd woken up, thought I'd wandered off into the corn, and alerted everyone in the house.
But after a few batches, they started looking better. The seams looked smoother. And the cake didn't show through as much, because I made a mighty thick coating on those golf ball molds! (Although, this lead to other problems - when eaten, the white chocolate felt way too thick and would crack heavily, leading the cake ball to fall off the stick.)
4. Wipe down your previously-used glass bowl and oil it well. Place the dough in bowl and turn to coat surface of dough with the oil. Cover with plastic wrap that has been sprayed with non-stick spray (trust me on this one). Cover with a towel and put it in a warm area. Allow to rise until it has doubled in bulk.
The allegations of preaching jihad and of the madrasa emerged in speeches and pamphlets as around 200 Muslims gathered in thewomen's room at Auckland's Jamia Musjid Al-Mustafa mosque on Thursday night.
Abstract ideas cannot be patented but their applications can qualify for patent protection. For example, “Einstein could not patent his celebrated law that E MC2; nor could Newton have patented the law of gravity. Such discoveries are ‘manifestations of Nature, free to all men and reserved exclusively to none”. General ideas remain in the public domain but their applications may be privatized through the patenting process.
Affliction deadens the pleasures of sense, and
Predictably, however, the disproportionate acclaim garnered by In-A-Gadda-Da-Vida (title came from 17-minute composition by Doug Ingle) became something of a millstone around their necks. Braunn left in late 1969, to be replaced by the twin guitars of Mike Pinera and Larry Reinhardt (a former associate of Duane Allman).
I found records of love poems like this one, written by a girl going down to the river to bathe in a diaphanous dress…
What do you think? Should the pop music industry be allowed to continue making steampunk-inspired music videos or should they stay far, far away?
The bishops rightly say, “Restrictions on religious liberty are an attack on civil society and the American genius for voluntary associations.”
Pancras was the son of a noble family of Phrygia. He came to Rome in the reign of the Emperors Diocletian and Maximian, being then a boy of fourteen years of age. There he was baptized by the Bishop of Rome, and Drought up in the Christian faith. On this account he was soon after taken, and having constantly refused to sacrifice to the gods, he offered his neck to the -executioner with manly courage, and won a glorious crown of martyrdom. The Lady Octavilla took his body by night, embalmed it with precious ointments, and buried it on the Aurelian Way.
What a great show! Extreme Rules on Sunday looks to be interesting, as a lot of the contenders in the match ups are on fairly even ground. This Pay Per View could change the make-up of the WWE as we know it. In one night, we could have two new Champions, and a new face of the WWE. I will back next week, to blog about the aftermath of Extreme Rules. Also, look for my Extreme Rules prediction later in the week. Until then, take care and get after it.
1) Don’t think how far you have to go, think how far you have come. Early on I would do tricks w/myself.
At the Food and Drug Administration (FDA) and in the scientific community, considerable thought is being given to the potential legitimacy of psychedelics which have come out of the past and into the present.
When I first dripped the liquid in her ear as instructed, she jerked away, but I just held on to her and began to massage the liquid into her ears. To my amazement she stopped trying to squirm away. The ear wash was not oily like the over the counter stuff that I am sure is loaded with all kinds of nasty chemicals. I used a few Q-Tips and the tissue and quickly cleaned her ears. As you can see in this picture, Pickle is not running away. You can also see that Max felt the need to get really close, to thoroughly examine that dirty Q-Tip for himself. I think he actually liked the smell.
In the last week, I've bought books by Laura Oldfield Ford, Philip Davenport, John Lanchester, Neil Campbell and others, yet not sure how much time I'll have to read them - or God forbid, write about them as well! Yet, I'm sitting here, with a week off, knowing that I need - for my own sanity; and because its what I do - to add to this stockpile of work, that at best might receive only a silent applause. I applaud those publishers, blogs and magazines that have carved out their own little coterie, their own little audience - its possible that that's enough; that it creates a shape and narrative around diverse work, and, in time, that will feed into the wider culture. Alternatively, it might be that we are all the followers of narrow sects, proclaimers of the true word, gathered together in dimly-lit basements, glad only that our solipsism is cast aside for a night a month, measuring out our achievements with other solipsists, always a little bit fearful (but possibly glad) that someone outside - some black-clad Roman will come and haul us from our self-designed cell and into the light of public testimony or punishment.
In all honesty, I just feel lost & really lonely. My job is going on alright. A is doing pretty well. Thank God! I don’t know why then I feel the way I do. I just know that I feel like I have no one. There are days I just want to give up. Off late, I feel this a lot more. I feel like if I switched my phone off, went away somewhere there probably will be no one who will miss me. I am pathetic & I know that too!!
In the 44 year history of the band, the one constant has been vocalist and guitarist Steve Miller.
José Manuel Echandi, a former Defender of the Citizens in Costa Rica, answered the call and accused Cuba of torture in blocking the journalist's release.
I know it’s going to be hard. God knows I’ve tried to give up so many times before. But I have to do it now. The things I do for this thing in my head disgust me. I can’t live life hanging over a sink. For one thing, I can’t afford the food bills. I’m sick of not being able to go into town because I don’t have a pound for the bus fare. I’m sick of lugging a shopping basket round the supermarket that I can barely carry because it’s so full of shit. I’m sick of having to lock my door and pretend I’m asleep if anyone knocks, because I can’t let them in when I’m halfway through a binge and my room stinks of chocolate.
What is the easiest thing you've ever grown?
Perhaps I will think on that one when we settle in Vietnam at the end of the year.
Meanwhile Mrs Patterson managed to push the emergency button in the hallway before the two women locked themselves up in the bathroom. They said they could hear 'screeching tyres, a crash and a shot.' The attackers then fled on foot into the veld with only two cellphones and a laptop computer - and the salaries of the workers.
Let’s just say that a great deal of our global climate change is, indeed, coming from external sources, such as modulations in the sun’s solar flares, perhaps some unknown element coming in from far more distant stellar influences, etc. Let’s just say we accept that. Okay, so, we have all of these complex and out of our control elements influencing our fragile, tiny planet.
Smiths Shoplifters of the world unite UK
The next five years would see two kings; Evil Merodach and Neriglissar from 560BC to 555 B.C.
One big highlight of our holiday last week was a quick trip to the snow. The children have looked at snowy travel brochures, stories, weather reports and websites for a couple of years, so this was a much anticipated experience!
Jesus, dying on the cross was not about giving his life as a demonstration of power nor was it to save us from our so called sins. It was a demonstration that He was not his body or mind or anything else we all tend to identify ourselves with.
i don't know if you've heard of the Sparkle Project, but in case you haven't, haaaa.
Oh wait, that's what before & after pictures are for :)
Soooo...I wrote this last night. And then I realized how hot and tired I was and then I gave up. Don't worry...I will finish the story that I started yesterday. And I also inserted a few random pictures because NOBODY likes to read a big ol' post with no pictures, am I right? ;)
Tonight, I feel like time isn't so much a foe to be beaten back before wrinkles, gray hair, and an empty nest overtake me. Instead, it is a series of moments during which I have endless choices of how to spend it. It is my quiet encourager reminding me that I do not have forever and that I have to chose carefully and thoughtfully.
Paulo Silber, a spokesman for the Para state government, said the 60 officers were deployed to three cities. He did not provide further details.
Okay - let's not go crazy.
There was a time in the not so distant past when I would have had no problem answering this question. I would have had a list of answers as long as my arm that would have rolled off my tongue (or my fingers in this case) so fast that it would have made your head spin. But that was then, and this is now. I don’t think there is anything that I actually hate about myself anymore, so the best I can do is try to meet this challenge halfway…
5 examine
ship, with a rotating sprinkler
RR–Now I mentioned one place in the book that we were on Bragg Road one night, me and a friend of mine, and suddenly everything went dead quiet. This was a very eerie feeling. It was in the springtime, we were in the middle of the swamplands, and all of a sudden, everything went dead quiet.
5 Never Say Never 3:46
If we are faithful to ask forgiveness, then He will be faithful to forgive.
... which is from the same brewery (Smisje, in East Flanders, in case you were wondering) and is a clearly marked 9% ABV Smisje Dubbel, though the least said about the creatures on the label the better. Another fizzy one, the foam literally roared as it subsided, leaving me with a heady-smelling swampy glass of brown. The booze vapour is overpowering: a mix of port, dark rum and kirsch thrown together in a way that screams hangover fuel but actually tastes quite nice. I've never met a dubbel like this. Each sip boasts serious alcohol, but then sings daintily of autumnal orchard produce and old oak in dusty cellars. I find it disarmingly tasty and would love to know how they did it. It would make an ideal dessert beer and if I had more I'd be giving serious thought to introducing it to some quality ice cream.
Book: San Francisco A La Carte
He said the state government would also launch a website on Thursday to enable the public to verify the awards and check on the background of Selangor Datuks.
November 23
Mole RH. Irradiation of the embryo and fetus. Br J Radiol 1987; 60: 17-31.
D house I dey live don scatta. Dem talk say dey no build am well and one day wen I dey road my wife call me and talk say all her belonging don scatta wd d house,dat she manage escape wd our pikin sef. E no b like say na big house oh. Na house wey get plenty shop inside and my friend Emeka dey slip for for him shop,na him I dey manage wit. Now my wife and my pikin and me join dey squat for my bus-d only property I get for dis life.
9) Don't see how many Almond Joys I can fit in my mouth while I'm supposed to be writing.
A few months of negotiation, and we quit our jobs, gave away our possessions, and drove ourselves and a few boxes of books, the 800 miles on Hwy 101 to reach our new destination. Hubby had made a couple of extra trips ahead of me, to get the house painted, the beds bought, the utilities turned on. He chose his office with the view of the forest. I chose mine with the water view. We have furnished the place simply. We remodeled the kitchen, added a sun room, modernized the baths and the flooring, made the place comfortable.
Neenah ~ Desert Storm Card Stock
You will note that there is some wiggle room in these statements. It is “almost certain” that humans are responsible; nasty things will “probably” happen. That is because all science can ever be is the best guess of the best minds. Also, the climate is a complex system, meaning it can behave in ways that are opaque beyond our most sophisticated calculations. But, as I have often been told, those statements are as true as any scientific statements can be, and nobody — I repeat, nobody — has been able to refute this. In short, to deny any of these statements is to put yourself beyond the bounds of rational discourse.
All the tomato seedlings are doing great. The first pepper seedling popped up yesterday. Now I’m just waiting for more. I’ll keep a close eye on them the next couple of days.
The huge bridge symbolizes Kit's desire for meaningful interpersonal connections, but Johnson employs the metaphor delicately enough that it's never annoying. At novella length, Johnson is able to coax the relationships between her characters along gently, in a way that proves most satisfying. For example, halfway into the story, Kit and Rasali have spent a fair bit of time together but it's not clear how close they have become. Then, while Rasali is on the opposite bank, Kit sees one of his bridge workers killed. Kit first worries how the townspeople will react, then flashes back to a university instructor talking about how Kit relates to people:You're good with people, I've seen it. You like them. . . . But inside the framework of a project. Right now it's your studies. Later it'll be roads and bridges. But people around you -- their lives go on outside the framework. They're not just tools to your hand, even likable tools. Your life should go on, too. You should have more than roads to live for. Because if something does go wrong, you'll need what you're feeling to matter, to someone somewhere, anyway.When Rasali returns to Kit's side of the river, she immediately helps him to express his own grief over those who have died under his command, and we realize, even if he does not, that Kit now has someone to whom what he's feeling matters.
Camera : 5 MP camera, Auto Focus, LED flash
It is not the best example, I did it kind of quickly--not to mention, it is a little creepy. I mean, I don't even know the girl. What if (on the off chance) she actually one day stumbles upon my etsy shop and sees a picture of herself there?? I know the odds aren't good, but still! Crazier things have happened.
Not wearing much eye makeup here, because my Sigma E35 is a scratchy motherfucker and irritated the crap out of my crease! I'm wearing Etude House LUCIDarling Fantastic Rouge Lipstick in #5 LED Lavender (what a mouthful!) over NYX Purple Rain Lipliner and you guessed it: Etude House Fresh Cherry Tint in #2 Pink. This is my go-to lipstain to wear under pink-toned lipsticks in case you couldn't tell. :P
Making Tourists feel at home in the Jungle, thats the slogan of Borneo Ecotourism. for further information about the tour you can visit this website http://www.borneo-ecotourism.com/
You see, this was a repossession on a Lr-40XR. And we were told that the XR models all had the larger fuel tanks. The original 40's had a max fuel load of 5375lbs. This is enough for 3 and a half hours with reserve. An option for a larger 6060lb fuel tank was introduced with the BR models. This works out to a 4.5 hour range with reserve. And we'd done all our leg calculations with that 4.5 hour range in mind. But, whoever originally spec'd this airplane out must have thought that 3.5 hours will get you anywhere in India comfortably. There's no need for a larger tank. That sound you hear was the original plan finally dying.
The oil from the laksa paste will spilt out, this is perfectly normal, so don't worry!
Just before 3pm, some protestors breached the barricade surrounding the landmark, leading police to disperse the crowd with tear gas and water cannons.
Still I hold it true
6. Add the prepared pork fat, folding in so that it is evenly distributed throughout the meat paste.
Denim Jacket: Gap
“So,” said Rick, upon seeing me for the first time in over seven months, “you staying in North Beach? Want me to show you around your neighborhood tonight?” I was lucky to have found an apartment in North Beach due to its excellent proximity to the office, but the added bonus was all of the foreseeable trouble I would be getting into in my off-work hours. Rick is without doubt the pitchfork waving ambassador of both North Beach and fernet shots, but when I realized that my apartment was kitty-corner to Grant & Green – the bar that everyone goes to AFTER the happy hour bar – I knew that things could easily go from crazy to, well, crazier. So, to answer his question, of course I said yes.
5). Better Sharing Features: It’s only now that the iOS 6 features have included better Twitter integration. Having Facebook and Google+ would be a great start and stuff such as Evernote,instagram should also be added because they are becoming highly popular as social tools.
Foundation ring: ch4, join with sl st to make a foundation ring.
Key = llave = shave
Psalm 49: 5-9 says: Why should I fear when evil days come, when wicked deceivers surround me; those who trust in their wealth and boast of their great riches? No man can redeem the life of another or give to God a ransom for him; the ransom for a life is costly, no payment is ever enough; that he should live on forever and not sees decay.
They were a hit…almost. Little one did not eat much but she was not feeling well that evening, but had she been 100% I am sure she would have devoured these. Big one, husband and I all loved them. These chickpea cakes will definitely be making a repeat appearance!
Similarly, I seem to recall that Alexander the Great invaded India, and that he took himself an Asian bride. His lonely soldiers had been away from home for twelve years, so you can be damn sure they mixed with the locals. I am sure we would have a whip round to fly Bonnie out to the Punjab so she can tell the Punjabis they have to give up any claim to their homeland because they are part Macedonian. However, I suggest she makes sure her medical insurance, and will, are up to date first.
No pressure.
Don't get me wrong. I understand why first-run theaters charge as much as they do on concessions. The percentage they get from the box office only goes so far, so they have to make it up somewhere. I get that. I do. I even sympathize, to a degree.
"His word is in my heart like a fire, a fire shut up in my bones.
It is truly fortunate that we have such a large chunk of our Victorian past preserved complete at the edge of our downtown. Indeed, it is amazing that we have as many old houses as we do still standing in the neighborhoods around the County Courthouse.
by MYSELF. This is not fair. I seriously can't wait
Having read all that, it seems sensible to continue my reading with another non-fiction book: The Global Warming Survival Kit by Brian Clegg. I hope it will suggest a way of coping with what now feels like an impending catastrophe.
Today in Ireland took place a massive national demonstration in the national sporting arena with up to 3000 people cramming in to hear speech’s and bands all encouraging ordinary Irish folk to refuse to pay the household charge. What a reaction this got I have been following developments all day and speech’s from our own TD Joe Higgins in Ireland getting a fantastic reception too. This can be the spark that lights this campaign and allows it to really take off I feel.
As an example, Tufnel recently composed a somber piece of classical music for the piano entitled “Lick my Love Pump“. He is currently circulating the composition in hopes of maybe turning the piece into a Rock Opera or Broadway Musical.
A very different story is told in The Sorcerer’s Apprentices: A Season in the Kitchen at Ferran Adria’s Elbulli ($16.00, Free Press, softcover) by Lisa Abend. Available at last in softcover, the author was given extraordinary access to a famed chef and his restaurant; one elected the best restaurant five times before it made international headlines when it closed in 2011. Here is a look behind the scenes where culinary magic is created and how he trained a new generation of chefs as they struggle to master the long hours, the techniques, and the tensions evoked. For “foodies”, it is a grand read.
On Saturday, I hopped on the N-Judah to head downtown to go to a friend's anniversary and housewarming party. Halfway to my destination, a gaggle of loud, crazy young people (I know I sound like I haven't put my dentures in yet, but that's what they were), dressed in what can only be described as an updated version of Summer of Love attire, crammed themselves onto the once quiet train. The girls had the headscarves, flower face paints, long hair and halter tops, but one boy was wearing SquareBob Spongepants pants under his Nesta Bob Marley shirt, one boy was wearing a pirate hat and another a green visor that said Las Vegas on it.
Enough preliminaries; to the chase. Dear readers, it is a good and biblical thing to fast for the right reasons. And Franklin makes some excellent points in his book. But in any Christian book, one looks for theological consistency. Yes, some (including in my church) will instantly pipe up: “I don’t care about this so-called ‘theology’ stuff; I only care about God’s word” (something like that). However, I mean what I say. The Bible is both used and abused, and in order to know which is which, one needs theology. So this is not a case of Bible OR theology; it is a case of Bible AND theology. And in that order.
It’s about the bigger picture, you say,
My review of this fascinating documentary/essay film went up yesterday at Slant Magazine; I'll link to it in a separate post. It opens at Film Forum on Wednesday, and it really is something to see, even if you're not too familiar with the work of German-born writer W. G. Sebald.
Tom Liu went further to urge PM Lee to ignore Singaporeans, echoing the words of another Filipino new citizen Angelo Marc Jandugan earlier:
Recently I’ve fallen in love with Hawaiian purple sweet potatoes, especially the ones served at one of my favorite restaurants, Monkeypod Kitchen. Unfortunately I can’t afford to go there and eat them as much as I’d like to, so while I was at Costco the other day I picked up a 5 lb. box and figured I’d try my hand at cooking them. I love mashed purple sweet potatoes, but there was no need to cook all 5 lb. this way so I decided I’d also try making some baked potato chips.
Audience: I want to make an observation. Stop apathy. Politicians in between elections have to make themselves known to the electorate. Knock on the door now and again in between elections. We never see you except for a few weeks when we can’t turn round without tripping over you!
When your bin is emptied into the truck, your rubbish is taken away forever. It can never return. In the same way through coaching, when you change your behaviour or eliminate a
The myth making and flights of self righteous fantasy that passes for American history, can be truly amazing. Everything is boiled down into a delicious black and white, where we are the righteous, God given power of purity and butterflies and rainbows, who must go out on our unicorns and do battle with evil.
Love the weathered wood
For me it's fear- fear of me being a bad parent, fear of my kid
Accessories – Paper Mache Wand, Large, Large Scallop and Small Circle Nestabilities, Pink Kaisercraft Rhinestones, Markers, Blender Pen, Scor Pal, Grosgrain Ribbon, 1/8 circle punch, double sided tape, Fiskars Border Punch.
Shihfen Waterfall is the largest waterfall in Taiwan. Looking at the picture, you can see it is a perfect waterfall. As those African Explorers, we well also fully equipped. Grace brought with her the D7000 with 18-200 VR lens and I brought my D700 with 27-300 VR lens. For the people in-the-know, we basically have the same set up. I have an additional 20 mm lens with me. We also brought neutral density filter, polarization filter and remote trigger release. We used the neutral density filter for most of the pictures but not the other two accessories (too lazy). More importantly we brought two professional Gitzo carbon fiber tripods. It was using these tripods that enable us to use shutter speed at 2 to 5 seconds to generate this cotton cloud feeling of the water.
or evil.
Thanks for stopping by....the team has assembled some seriously
There’s really a ton that a songwriter can learn from Gotye’s current hit, “Somebody That I Used To Know.” And some of what makes the song so great is subtle enough that you wouldn’t necessarily notice on a first listen. The truly fantastic songs in any genre are like that; you’re so busy enjoying the experience that it’s not until you’ve listened several times that you start to realize why the song is working so well.
I had it on the front of my Tandem for many years.
An interesting addition you'll often find here is a random waveform that changes regularly.
Snackman diffused a fight on a New York City subway by getting between the kicking legs of a man and woman, all the while never breaking his stride of munching on his stack of Pringles. Did the dried potato flakes have something to do with Snackman’s heroism? Or maybe it was the Pringle man’s pristine mustache? Or the buckets and buckets of salt? Who knows?
So without further ado..
Thank you for visiting and have a fabulous Saturday. Hugs, Mette
I have got as far as thinking about chamfer stops and how I will produce them so I think I will have a play around with the chamfer tool again and see how it looks.
1369 *D-II/2(A)/2001. “Marshall Patner (1931-2000).” Dedication, First Friday Lecture, The Cultural Center, Chicago Public Library, Chicago, Illinois. (Incorporated in Item C-2001(1), above.)
Told from the perspective of Penelope and twelve of her maids, The Penelopiad recounts what happened to everyone left behind whilst Odysseus was on his many voyages after the Trojan War. Was Penelope as loyal and devoted as she made out to be? The Penelopiad is part of the Canongate Myth series.
Super Junior’s Eunhyuk told a personal anecdote about how he happened to drink for the first time in 27 years and his drinking habits.
and carving your name in glass
And sing their joyful song.
The big surprise of the first half was the enthusiasm for Saint Arnold Weedwacker, which was introduced as a year-round beer during the second quarter. Early sales of Weedwacker have rivaled Saint Arnold’s top-seller Saint Arnold Fancy Lawnmower Beer.
DOLLY: when we were younger, my dad used to call me and my sisters his Dollies. I don’t know why, where it came from, never got to ask him. So now, my sisters and I all call each other Dolly. My oldest sister is “Big” Dolly, next oldest is “Middle” Dolly, and I’m “Little” Dolly. It helps us to distinguish who we’re talking about when we’re on the phone.
Then the dam of life burst, and cast me on the lower reaches of the Thames where I wallow still. Yet Swansea moments recur even here, like a madeleine dipped in oyster water.
The men had held a family hostage in Moreleta Park earlier in the day.
Instead of doing your regular cardio workouts this week, give this circuit a try! Do all the exercises in order and choose your intensity based on your current fitness level.
I have several contests coming up as well as a full out blog tour but I'll share those details in the near future.
But I guess I`ll make an exception for this special one. ;)
(or 4 as i always say because i like to count kingsley)
Those of us who did not participate in the headlong rush into property bubbles and banking insanity, have reason enough to feel peeved at our banks but the sad facts are that firstly, the Government’s ineptitude, in particular the radical waste of public funds in supporting Anglo Irish Bank, is now, in practical terms, irreversible and secondly, we need to restore a functioning banking system by rehabilitating both AIB Bank and Bank of Ireland as part of our return to prosperity.
layout by Alexia
When the whole country has been shouting one name for the last half a dozen month’s how can the FA just ignore the people’s voice,you could argue that,the last time the FA chose the popular option they ended up with Kevin Keegan,true,but Harry has much more to offer the England team,as a West Ham fan I remember all to well what he did for our club,we were hovering around relegation when he arrived,within a short time he had us playing attacking football and finishing 5th in the Premier league and qualifying for Europe,as well as bringing through some of the best talent the game has seen in the last decade,Joe Cole,Frank Lampard,Rio Ferdinand,Michael Carrick…..
in a public place and make a big mess
I understand that philosophy - labor and delivery didn't hurt that badly, did it? I'm pretty sure it wasn't that bad. It'll be a piece of cake this time.
2010.08.31 Israel Hebron 4 0 A pregnant woman is among four young Jews gunned down in cold blood by Hamas terrorists.
I think you’d need a team of scientists to figure out what on earth this fabric is! The closest to a description I can come to is ‘some sort of matelassé/brocade-y stuff’. It’s black with gold spots (or gold with black spots if you used the reverse) and I found it in a bargain bin of a fabric shop in the Haight-Ashbury district in San Francisco about five years ago, shortly before having the best nachos of my life. The fabric is quite narrow so I bought way more than would normally. As precious as it is, this had been in my stash for long enough for me to go crazy and make this dress without first toiling it up. I still have a fair bit left. This pattern is pretty fabric efficient.
Giveaway open to UK and INTERNATIONAL followers, all welcome, no postage to pay etc :)
ALEX BRUMMER: Firing up the growth machine 04/04/12
Next was the Jive competition (Yay T-Bone!) and some shopping, where I finally purchased my pink Remix shoes to wear that evening! After a record quick-change in our room for evening, we resurfaced for more music. I adore how Bethany and Brianna wore fancy black dresses and hats that night. Think I might have to make that a new tradition...fancy black duds for Sunday Night!
I’m certainly not a big “rib” kind of gal, but let me tell you there were a few that were just mouth watering.
The river is full, my tears are rolling.
Maybe lie is a harsh word, but they can certainly be misleading, and wrong.
Says Sarah about the talent of photographer Rebecca Wilkowski: "Rebecca is awesome and sooooo talented!!! We just loved her great composition and lighting skills. She captured the moments that were the most important and memorable. Within a couple hours of meeting everyone, Rebecca was able to capture all of their little nuances, expressions and mannerisms that make each of them so special. . . ."
'Don't squeeze the fruit.' 'Don't smell the sausages.' 'Don't finger the rabbits.' 'Don't badger the fish.' 'Don't drink the gin.' 'Don't try to leave wearing the suits.' 'Don't watch the televisions for three hours in your pants.' 'Don't shit in the toilets - they're for display purposes only.' 'Don't use the pornography.'
You must manage all alcohol at an event, even if it’s BYO.
1 bag of frozen mixed vegetables
Howard: Right, and I was friends with her as well, and every time I’d see her, she’d say to me, “I’ve got a girl you gotta meet!” The more she said that, the quicker I was running the other way. I was traveling a lot. I was doing well. I was thinking that “this girl” must have a problem or something with her. So I was in Los Angeles working in a club, and they contacted me about writing some music for them. So we met in a club in Los Angeles, and that was it. We looked at each other, and that was that..
This is the BOM for one of my quilt guilds. Ok..I confess..it's not really the BOM...The real one is a school house and then they give you a different design each month for the center. I didn't really want to do a school house and one of my guild friends (Hi Bev!) said she was thinking about using this instead of the school house as it has the same 6 inch center. She ultimately decided to do the school house and I totally stole her idea. The photo isn't the best..it was taken this evening and the lighting isn't the best in the sewing room..
They know the accused were too perfect, the accuser too unbalanced and the prosecutor was a sociopath, they will not make that mistake again, but they will try again because they have no option.
So this stereotype persisted and went on for over a thousand years.
The latest additions to our K'nex collection comes courtesy of K'nex, who sent us 2 of their classic sets to commemorate the 20th anniversary:
From meeting with scouts at fair time we get an overview of what their clients are buying and we hear about the books being talked about as the big fair books.
(All the emphasis in the following quote is my own)
Remember Top Gun? No, not the beach volleyball scene - which by the way, in Florida I don't think many people play beach volleyball in their jeans....... Remember the phrase "I feel the need for speed"? Seems like I am always wishing I had some speed!
4) There are albino redwoods in several places around the state, like the one e Mark at Tales from the Trails found below. Of course it's not true albinism in the sense of vertebrates, but rather a lack of chloroplasts, which in turn means they can't photosynthesize; but since redwoods often share root systems, they can get away with it (not surprising in retrospect that redwoods do this but still cool. Clonally reproducing organisms like redwoods often share resources since it's identical genes cooperating with themselves.) I'm going to be heading down to Henry Cowell State Park tomorrow to check some out and go for a nice Santa Cruz Mountains run.
· CSS (Cascading Style Sheets) to provide formatting;
Ribbon: Purple by unknown, Barely Banana by Stampin' Up!
Ashley Greene and her boyfriend, Joe Jonas, rang in 2011 at a private party last night, December 31, in Los Angeles.
If they do, I don't want to know them.
And it was a beautiful thing.
A. appeal to the courts.
You just know that the majority of soldiers have no respect for the Traitor-in-Chief. They know he is a complete fraud who hates their guts.
Tevye’s super power is the AMAZING ability to clog any toilet with a single poop! How he can do this is completely beyond me. I’m curious, though not enough to ask for details. I think it actually pertains to excessive toilet paper usage, rather than the size of any given poop. While the frequency has decreased in recent months, for a while it was happening numerous times a week.
If anyone is reading this and did vote for my article, can I just say a massive thank you from the bottom of my heart. It has really meant something to achieve this. I think only anybody who writes can fully understand what it means.
You probably think I am being a tad over dramatic at this point but bear with me, I am going somewhere with this…
And I Didn't Die That Time, Either
So until today I was dealing with a few lists. I decided to get the best bang for my bucks, so in spite of having Karchev, Sorscha and epic Irusk, I thought I’d take a caster with +6 Warjack points. That left me with either regular Irusk or epic Sorscha. And I still had at least a couple of lists for each of them.
Jeff Hunt (REP) 10.95% 106
My lovely daughter is dancing around the house and singing. She does this a lot. I smile when she does it, because it's one of those things I can look at and say, "Yes! She gets that from me!" (Especially the highly uncoordinated dance moves!) Today she is singing a song that she's making up as she goes along:
Poor quality service and yet everytime asked for good pay raise without considering the economic condition. Almost every industry has offered VSS, laid off workers, but public sector are hiring more people than it should be. Before ask for raise, CUEPAC should review internally whether all of its member entitled to or not?
scallions, cilantro, chopped honey roasted peanuts, hoison sauce, lime, for garnish
Regret keeps building, why didn’t he have her stay?
Thanks to Mark Johnson for the samples!
You can take a snake's poison, leave him with his fangs
Advantages: Far less fat and a much stronger flavor. Disadvantage: Turkey’s a little more expensive than chicken, but I think it’s worth it even if only for the fact that you won’t ever find yourself adding chicken soup powder to get the flavor you need. And overall, you will need less turkey for the equivalent flavor, so it probably evens itself out in the end.
Nowadays the leading indicator and coincident indicator shows downward trends since March 2010.
The debut album is a little too slow and perhaps even maudlin for many (and whose idea was it to get Clarence Clemmons to guest on sax anyway...Little Steven?), but I like it if only for its smart seventies aura and abilities to, like the Raspberries, take the mid-sixties English rock these guys "grew up with" and beef it up for a seventies audience. Smart, sharp and quite sophisticated in its own mop topped way...too bad stuff like this failed to make an indent into the beanies of mid-Amerigan youth while Foreigner did, or maybe we wouldn't be living in the current state of duh that we most certainly are!
You know those people, who no matter what, love you regardless. They hear you say something kind of weird and awkward and they just laugh because it was weird and awkward and not suddenly categorize me as a weird and awkward person forever.
-Baguette for dinner at the hostel after a day of being on our feet…literally!
Props; English props are both good, but its got to be Jenkins and Adam Jones (Wales and Wales)
Be blessed.
The current conservative government in Spain is attempting a new round of reforms. In France, by contrast, it looks like they are just about to elect a Socialist to protect the welfare state, replacing Nicolas Sarkozy, a "conservative" (by French standards) who was largely ineffectual at reforming the system.
“Now, we do not know what size or shape a final package will take, but it would be terribly unfortunate if the president was willing to veto a debt-limit increase simply because its timing would not be ideal for his reelection campaign. “We want the most significant deficit-reduction possible, but linking the full faith and credit of the United States to presidential campaign politics is not a defensible position,” the aide added, speaking on the condition of anonymity to discuss Boehner’s strategy…. – WaPo, 7-23-11
Dear little friend of mine, I never knew.
Also, as Massimo notes, logic can be considered a branch of philosophy, and there's no doubt that logic, or at least the ability of philosophers to think more logically than many scientists, has also contributed to science. One example is the work of Philip Kitcher, a philosopher at Columbia who continues to use logical tools to attack flawed science (two of my favorites are his dissection of creationism, Abusing Science, and his critique of sociobiology, Vaulting Ambition). And I'd be remiss if I didn't add Dan Dennett, who has clarified for many of us (including scientists) the importance of Darwinism and the formidable problems involved in studying consciousness.
Just thought I'd post that I had a great day today. It started out early as hell, but I had coffee all ready to go and Ingrid was in a good mood. So, it was doable. I had my bathroom and kitchen cleaned, Ingrid had breakfast, I'd had two cups of coffee, and Otis was down for a nap all by 9am. Sheesh.
By the end of the first chapter I was hooked. "Paranoid? Probably. But just because you're paranoid doesn't mean that there isn't an invisible demon about to eat your face." The voice is incredible. I really felt sorry for Harry while he's trying to work with a police contact, keep a gangster from sending his thugs after him, figure out who is cooking up the new drug on the streets (to help with point 2), not reveal anything to a sexy reporter, solve a grisly set of murders caused by magic, and not take the rap for it by the police as well as the White Council and a biased Warden. Oh yeah, and not get killed before the Council even meets to put him on trial. What's a nearly broke wizard to do? Keep moving of course. And have a little faith that he's the good guy.
While we're in France this summer, we'll be touring Normandy, the site of the Allied invasion. Last weekend, we watched Saving Private Ryan to become more familiar with June 6th, 1944, otherwise known as D-Day. It is an incredible movie, not just about D-Day but also about WWII. Of course, as a war movie, it is quite bloody - in fact the bloodiest movie I've ever watched. And, I did fast forward through a couple of 'inappropiate conversations' (which were while they were waiting for the tanks by the bridge). But, we are both a lot more aware of what D-Day meant to the war now.
Il mio blog si rivolge per lo più a gruppi che hanno avuto vita e fortuna negli anni '90, ma ogni tanto faccio qualche bel salto temporale in avanti per parlare di gruppi quasi recenti o quantomeno degli anni 2000.
Here's the back of the card, sent to Mrs. Addie Wolcott in Miami, Florida in 1955.
... and the other is Orange Zest Cestrum (Cestrum aurantiaum 'Orange Zest'). This plant came to the garden center in late April with blooms on it, I planted it in May in full of color, and not one day has gone by since when it was not in flower. I know another local gardener who grows it and it dies to the roots, but comes back reliably. I am a little warmer in the winter than where they are, so I have high hopes it may be more shrub-like.
My daughter, Breann, made me this paper flower (the flower petals are paper but the stem is grass), and gave it to me during my work hours, I just love working at home and it enables me to be mommy before being working mommy, I am so blessed! I realize that not every job will allow a person to stay at home with their kids, but I have really tried to do so with this as well as a lot of my jobs in the past (where I was even able to take them to work with me), and I am so blessed that I am with a company where I can work at home and be a stay at home/work at home mom while I provide my kids the care that they need. And...getting little "work day suprises" like this, makes the evenings that I work even better!
The new Starbucks has opened off Dobbin Road in Columbia -- replacing the shop that had been across the road for as long as I have been in Howard County.
I did two shows – they went “gang busters” (a local saying for ‘they went rather spiffing’) – then I went a bit mental in the hot sun with a few ales inside me – Did you know how strict the licensing laws are over here? Crazy. I really thought I could steer this into an adventure but I just sailed the ship up a muddy creek of epic shit proportions.
Joni Mitchell, Trouble Child
“How, then, can they call on the one they have not believed in? And how can they believe in the one of whom they have not heard? And how can they hear without someone preaching to them? And how can they preach unless they are sent? As it is written, ‘How beautiful are the feet of those who bring good news!’” Romans 10:14-15 (NIV)
In The Nursery - Compulsion
The hub-cap seems to have hit me full in the face then swam on by.
Health Graduate School Fair
Follow me on Twitter: @LiamLFC_97
‘Secret Soundtrack’ uses ‘3D sound’ recorded in Deptford Market, based on and around Deptford High Street, to create a theatrical atmosphere that people can experience as they wonder around the market.
My least favorite is the Tri-Colour Purple....i only wore it to see the effects, and i have to say i dont like the purple on me~~~like on the GEO advert, it looks alot better~~~lol but i guess if i play it around abit i might find it helpful with certain make-up looks~~~
1 astute
I am fond of a detail and I spend a great deal of time fussing with details. I have recently embarked on a new project with photographer Carla Coulson where together we create and style images for an online photo library. These shots are exclusive to this agency and are available for magazine editors, journalists, publishers and any other interested parties to purchase for commercial publication or personal use. The fun part is that we work together most months, we create photographs that we love from scratch and even better we set all the shoots up at home. There is something magical about the light in Provence and especially in our farmhouse which is set against a backdrop of olive groves just outside the small village of Saint Rémy de Provence in Southern France. This light manages to turn even the mundane into the exquisite...and that is the most important detail when taking photographs...the light...if the light's not working then an image must perform overtime to evoke a reaction.
My mother is from Norway and I see my family from Norway about once each year. It’s not a lot. And it is definitely not enough to feel norwegian. I know, that’s where a part of me is from, and I even speak the language, but I don’t feel norwegian.
i am truly thankful for all of the love, traditions and memories we've shared.
“Non-traditional beds became the iconic symbol of California’s prison overcrowding crisis,” CDCR Secretary Matthew Cate said. “Now, gyms once filled with inmates in triple-bunk beds are open and can be used for their intended purpose. This demonstrates how much progress California has made in improving inmate conditions and employee safety.”
Dr. Sandra Kennedy, with Whole Life Ministries. If you're not familiar with her, she is a powerful teacher and she's especially anointed in the gift of healing. But the most amazing thing I found about her was her love for the Word of God. It was truly contagious! I came away wanting to read the Word, know the Word, and live the Word like I did when I first gave my heart to Jesus.
But again, I look at this in a rather open light. I could live in fear of thieves and use that as an excuse to lock everything down and shut it up in a box, or I could keep doing what I'm doing and trust that people of that nature are too lazy to do that much work for not very much gain.
Upon reflection, that shouldn't have mattered, I like it for what it is,that and I couldn't let good ol' Tommy down...
She's obsessive.
The color has stayed on my nails fairly well. My revlon still holds up better but this was pretty good.
They'll tut-tut and shrug it off.
2009-10 Donruss Elite
Everything In Print
My two sisters and I had our "Sisters Get-Together" at my house this weekend. Although we live in the same state and at the most 4 hours apart, we don't see each other that often and always look forward to our annual visit. This year it was my turn and we had a great time. Thank you, my precious sisters for being my family, my sister, my friend, and I do love you.
I didn't buy a thing, but Susan bought a great white McCoy plant pot for $25.00.
That last sentence is significant. The brewery part of the business was seen as viable, unlike whisky side. The brewery had just been dragged into crisis by the poor performance of Pattison's whisky trading.
May this joy unveil the sorrow,
The southern area of the tract is adjacent to some of the richest farmland in the country. Some of the acreage on the south side of the tract is non delineated wetlands and has potential for woody biomass production.
It’s intuitive enough for my young children to use without much instruction, and the responsiveness of the screen was great, although I think if I had a lot of typing to do I’d still want a separate keyboard to use with it. One thing is certain: developers are going to have a ball designing for this new toy.
I know, two blog post in one day,that is just not like me! ;)
Filing a disability claim is NOT as sim­ple as collecting the payout on a lottery ticket. You don’t just send in the claim and the company pays. It’s an extremely complex and potentially lengthy process that most people are simply not equipped to handle on their own, particularly when facing the major changes that sudden dis­ability can bring. Too much is at stake, and the risk of denial or litigation is far too great.
A high amount of frequency is being projected/injected to the natural environment yet once again. We see severe weather — damaging winds, hail, and possible tornadoes usually hit the center (or very close to the center 50 miles or less) of each ring / square / or sawtooth pattern.
But to get to the point at long last – often when a young player first breaks into the first team and plays well, I believe we get a glimpse, not of what the guy is capable of producing every match thereafter, but what level he might be able to reach in a few years with luck, hard work and careful guidance.
Wish I had had Mad Dog Math way way back when mine were littles...WISH I could have had it myself. I can't tell you HOW terrible it was to struggle through those multiplication tables way back in third grade...It was awful.
You must include your student ID number in each document, DO NOT include your name, the cover page attached should precede your supplements.
NY night club dress codes have always been a grey area matter. However what if you suspect Racism, or gender discrimination... what if it were size discrimination? What if it were your sole source of income?
The novel mostly focuses on Susan, and she's a well-written and likable character, albeit a bit selfish and dense at times. She stays at home to paint - but never seems to get around to it, even though she has a nanny take care of Emma during the day - while her husband works long hours at a job he hates to support them. Okay, that doesn't sound too horrible, but Alex is also an artist and gave up his dreams to take care of his family. I felt sorry for him.
Whatever happened to all of Nicholas Sparks’ books being set in North Carolina? I mean, really? Hampton, Louisiana? Jambalaya night instead of taco night? Whyyyyyyyyy!!
And of course, it was quite mediocre. Oh well, lesson learned.
I particularly appreciated the very first comment to this article from Wakeus_com:
In the mist of all this cold and flu, as I lay in bed trying to shake the chills all the while sweating until I had to change my clothes I heard growls and barks and whimpers...the end result being an emergency run to the on call, night time vet because our German Shepard dog attacked our German Shepard puppy and about took his eye out! When it rains it pours! I've about had it and between feeling little bits better and trying to function I've been bleaching the entire house, removing sheets and extra bleaching the bathrooms trying to get rid of this crappy virus! So far today I'm doing slightly better the scare of the puppy attack snapped me maybe into feeling better! all kids attended school this morning and I'm officially out of NyQuil...
“Leave it to you to smile in the face of danger,” Aurelius groused. “Can you call off your ankle-biter? She’s scuffing my boots!”
And flound'ring like a man in fire or lime...
Yesterday I started wondering when and how often mainstream Americans spend time in formal or informal single-gender groups. Many teens and a few people in their early twenties participate in single-gender sports teams. A few participate in Boy Scouts or Girl Scouts, though I believe enrollment numbers are down for both organizations. In popular culture, watching sports is often presented as a male bonding activity, and book clubs as female--though in practice, both are probably mixed-gender activities more than single gender.
I can't really choose who'd win though.. Too hard, lol.
In other news on the homefront! I have a Silhouette Cameo arriving today!!! woohoo!! I'll get back to you on that! I love my cricuts but I've been very disappointed in them and CCR lately! and I love the Print and Cut feature on my very testy Imagine so I thought I'd give it a whirl with the Cameo!
Lambert & Whitham (2001) posit that the cheek pouches is an anatomical solution to maximizing energetic input while mitigating competition over limited food resources.
Given the price and food quality, I quite like Macleod Sushi & BBQ and will definitely go back. As Macleod’s chef Ken (the person in charge of food quality) knows, consistent food, good price, and repeat customers are some of the factors that define a good restaurant.
"I have a cat at home. Do you have a cat? Does it have a name? My cat's name is Mark. My uncle is Mark. Does your cat sleep? My cat eats."
Canadians warn us: Government healthcare too good to be true
Guy Stephenson, chief commercial officer at Global Infrastructure Partners owned Gatwick, said the airport – the UK’s second largest – could serve London “just as effectively” as Heathrow, where take-off and landing slots are…….
If you are happy to just read one blog entry from this wonderful learning experience I am having and the perspectives, conversations and inspirations it brings I would be very happy as well…
1. Start small: do a small sketch or a small study in oil, watercolour or acrylic. It will only take you ten minutes to an hour – not much time really. The main obstacle is often to get started and if you tell yourself “I am just going to make a small study, nothing much really”, your brain stops worrying about it and you passed the first hurdle.
Gilded Age gowns and beaded purses – count us in! We hope you enjoyed our time with Natalie as much as we did – and we’re curious to know your own thoughts on how to make the most of a thrifting trip. Come tell us on Twitter and Facebook – we love hearing from you!
Guarding national heritage no matter what or where
Flowering Love Card
"She's coming, coming, coming"
Corkscrews. You just twirl and twirl the hair until it stays. Oh yeah, Black hair does that. Stays. If you plait White/Asian hair, you probably have to put something on the end. You don't with Black hair. (NB, Many Caribbean Blacks are mixed, and not all mixed hair will stay.)
Furthermore, one of the most significant findings is that, contrary to widely-held assumptions, making abortion illegal in Chile did not result in an increase in maternal mortality. In fact, after abortion was made illegal in 1989, the MMR continued to decrease from 41.3 to 12.7 per 100,000 live births (69.2% reduction).
Some young (and old) people who find sanskrit hard and who, find the commentaries on the gita befuddling.
Chanted the oblivious nights in the octet colours of the kaleidoscope
With a deft flourish of tentacles, the creature slithered back inside the self-service machine. The machine fell together into its old shape again. A globule of slime was trailing down the side of the machine until it began to recite in a bland voice, “unexpected item in the bagging area.”
Tuesday evening saw the second class of the day and whilst most of the "students" were newbies I also had some who had been to the morning session so two more cards were called for. The first was a revisit to a technique I had previously used but this time I made sure it would fit in the envelope. Thankfully no-one had made this one previously. The paper used is a Prima one called "Sweet fairy Collection". Instead of the rose which I had used last time I chose a beautiful Marianne Creatables butterfly. By the way, if anyone struggles to remove these from the die, as I did at first, try rubbing it with hard soap before cutting. The die cut shape will then just pop out for you. No more poking, tearing and muttering under your breath!! Lol. We added a few ivory pearls as embellishment to the butterfly body.
Serve with masses of whipped cream and salted peanuts for an absolutely delicious dessert. Eat slowly – you will want to savour each and every bite!
03 Bounty Hunter 04:11
The pumpkins were on sale: 3 for $9.99. There were mums in all kinds of colors, but I wanted the pumpkin colored ones. I bought the 2 gallon size, which were on sale: 3 for $19.99. We’ll be able to plant them around the house and enjoy them for seasons to come.
I wasn't smart coming into this training plan. I basically ran Marine Corps, did very little running, ran Philly, did very little running, ran Hot Chocolate, did very little running and wham bam, thank you ma'am I'm training for a marathon again.
While no one knows which members of Fianna Fail will lose their seats at the next election - one thing is for sure, there will be a large group of them.
I LOVED it. I couldn’t believe I had never watched it before, but, then again, I’m glad I waited and saw it for the first time on the big screen. I’ve always said that that’s the proper way to see movies (which is why seeing Back to the Future on the big screen for the 25th anniversary re-release was such a big deal), and this didn’t disappoint…the 3D was even excellent! It’s hard to point out everything I liked about this movie, let alone what I DIDN’T like (there wasn’t much, if anything), but, overall, it was magnificent. Definitely one of my favorites now, and I only have to wait five months for it to be released on Blu-Ray for the first time! Woohoo!
We saw the nutritionist for the first time this month. She didn't tell us much because Rylee was still only eating formula. She wasn't ready to have baby food yet. So we talked about her feeding schedule and she reassured me that I was feeding her the right amount. :)
My parents insisted that if I wasn't going to University to study, that I should be working as soon as possible---and they instilled into me that if I could.t find the job that I really wanted, I should take a job to earn my way and get some experience---seemed fair to me so I applied for seven jobs--none of them in my chosen field but all not far from home.
My prophecy again.
was directly above his head. But he was unable to move, momentarily paralyzed due to shock.
9:23: I require Bluebird to re-do her worksheet in neat handwriting and then go upstairs because I thought I heard Monkeyboy. I stand outside his door for a minute and hear nothing, so I go back downstairs to resume Penguin's math lesson.
And last, but certainly not least, a big thank you to Amy Stahl at Frost it Pink for sponsoring the Tea Room challenge last week and supply a lovely prize for our winner!!
The leaders, who were joined
6. Don't Make Me Cry
I miss the idea of people having their photographs taken at the time of visit as a souvenir! I know you can still do this at places like theme parks, but wouldn't it be neat if you went out to a fancy dinner and cocktails and a roving photographer took your photo at the table? Even if it wasn't the most flattering (and I know there are probably better photographs of either of these people in existence, somewhere), wouldn't it be neat in the pre-Facebook, pre-camera phone age to go "And here we were, at the world famous blah blah lounge in blah blah Florida..."
While it doesn’t go in-depth – and doesn’t even give the characters’ names – the logline is an effective plot summary. While it’s not exactly the most exciting, it’s good enough to get me started. The nicest thing about a logline is that you can edit and change as you go along, but I’m going to save those kinds of things for after I finish the script. That way, I’ll be able to examine the plot and create a better hook for my logline.
Me? Back at the beginning of the year I would have answered yes to 13 of them.
He’s doing a series on Hebrews 11 and the verse of the day was, “By faith Abel offered God a better sacrifice than Cain. By faith he was commended as a righteous man when God spoke well of his offerings. And by faith he still speaks, even though he is dead.”
In a recent meeting with church leaders our own glorious political leader, David Cameron, welcomed a "Christian fightback" against what he characterised as "secularism", you know, those nasty people who want equal rights and representation for everyone regardless of faith or lack of it. Quite remarkably he praised this action saying,
Purpose to take some steps towards making your existence meaningful. “To convert somebody, go and take them by the hand and guide them,” Thomas Aquinas (medieval scholar).
I had promised Viv a scarf from San Telmo and time was pressing. Today would be our last opportunity and we had also promised to meet Roger for lunch.
1. DON’T worry so much about the DON’Ts and just go DO.*
Make a tag or bookmark featuring a memory theme. Can be a special memory, a memento from a special place, a love one.
"Noooooooooooooooooo," he said, pulling me back to bed. "Stay here with me." He started kissing my neck and pinned me to the bed.
I choose not to see my child as "manipulating" me when she is trying to get her needs met. I encourage her to communicate openly with me, but I accept that she is always expressing her needs in the best way she knows how at any given time. My children have no need to manipulate me, as long as I take their needs seriously. When a friend tells me she needs something, I respond to that need as best I can and as soon as possible, without accusing her of manipulating me. I do the same for my children.
"Sorry to see you go," Lasher said. "But I shall return with money from Grandma." He paused in the doorway to look at Jane. "Don't worry about me."
Billy Don't be a Hero....Bo Donaldson and the Heywoods
Considering it was only a small run, there were a few eventful thing that could be mentioned, firstly it was tipping it down with rain when we started, making it look like we were complete loonies, then half way around there was a MASSIVE puddle taking over the whole path and the road next to it so we had go on the grass to swerve cars splashing waves of water over us, and then Chris got chased by a tractor along the path and when he tried to go on the grass to let it pass, it followed him there too.
Precious. She has doubled in length since she first joined our family and her lean little body is sprawled across her bed, reminding me that time continues to pass without my noticing. In my darkened bedroom, her profile shows three curls, Daisy Duck eyelashes in the front, a curlicue topknot on her forehead, and a ducktail at the nape of her neck. One rosy and chubby cheek lies on her bed; the other faces me, begging to be touched.
But I'm going
Quickly she replied, "You will have a house if you go to Mexico."
You make an appointment, go along with your CV, then fill in a form with the same details that are on said CV and then you do the tests. Spelling, grammar, maths and typing speed. (yes I am using my own experience of looking for admin work, other types of work will obviously not use the same tests)
I was awaiting confirmation of some work from another department (which took a week longer than they said) which finally got done at 2pm today, my motivation (Motivation part 2) to try was dead in the water.
“The moral I draw is that the writer should seek his reward in the pleasure of his work and in release from the burden of thought; and, indifferent to aught else, care nothing for praise or censure, failure or success.”
Last night brought it back. I suspect my young friend would have been surprised at the young me. But as is the case as our skin thins and our hearing deteriorates, we become invisible. So although she likes me, I know that she could not see herself in me.
As the west crumbles and declines, how can they still claim that mass third immigration brings us benefit when clear evidence to the contrary is all around us. Yet they still claim it, and crazy as it seems, there are some who still believe it.
This wasn't a scare tactic. He didn't offer any ultimatum. He just started smacking. Hard and fast. That thing that I called humiliation before pshhhhh child's play. He didn't just give a few and let me up he kept me there for a good 25-30 whacks. No one came to my rescue. Either they thought I deserved it or they were all shocked into statue-ism. When he did let me up I was properly subdued. He gave me a little push on the small of my back to propel me to the door. Never have I walked faster. I won't even begin to try to convey my embarrassment.
We met Deborah, owner of the Applegate Valley Lavender Farm, who was kind enough to let us take a look even though they weren't open for tours that day! She showed us around, explained the different types of lavender and how to grow and take care of them, and let us pick a huge bunch for only $5! We talked about baking with lavender, bought a variety of lavender products, and took some pictures at the lovely farm.
Israel is the only legitimately Western nation in the region, a true democracy. It is America’s greatest ally there. It shares invaluable intelligence at the highest levels of our government. It is a major trading partner with the U.S. Most of the technology Americans use in communications and in our military contains Israeli developed components. All the large U.S. technology companies have research centers in Israel. It also has a very large army and is quite capable of defending itself, but an umbrella of protection should exist because it is strategically important to our own security and Europe’s.
Nor, I must admit, did it keep me from having a hella good time at Karla May's bachelorette bacchanalia lake-house getaway this past Saturday night with Jaye, Bookhart, Lindsay, and several other super-fun MILFs.
Look, no one brushed their teeth! And what are the chances that Superstar Agent has read about zombiepigs before, huh?
I've stamped the wreath and garland in Memento Tuxedo Black onto X-press It Blending Card and coloured with Copic Markers (G24, G28, R29, R59, Y21, Y35). The ornaments across the bottom are from the same set and have been stamped in Memento Ladybug, Bamboo Leaves and Cantaloupe, finishing with a clear rhinestone in the centre of each as well as in the top corners.
where everything is fair and right.
Auxiliary equipment and Options
I graduated from Transportation Design in 2009 and back then I didn't even think about starting my own business/label. I was doing mostly freelance work with short stints at various design consultancies. I just reached a point where I thought, I'm 24 years old and I need something long-term and fresh that I'm passionate about and that I can throw all my efforts into.
Spread/glaze some egg yolk on top of the tarts and bake them in the oven for about 20-25 mins or until golden brown at 180 degrees C.
After that I went back home, changed out of the suit and into jeans and a workshirt, and started loading up gear to play the first gig in my new band, Audio. I've been writing and playing with two of our brewers, Kevin James (who used to play bass in Trigger Happy and Bender) and Andrew Bartle (from the Natural Shocks and a bunch 0f other bands). We were playing at one of our accounts, The Dominion Tavern and opening for K-Man and the 45's, fronted by my good friend Kristen McNulty.
From the Kentucky coal mines to the California sun,
having been in the computer business professionally for nearly a decade, and a hobbyist for twice that long, I’ve become very jaded about product performance claims. My rule of thumb is to take whatever is claimed on the box, and divide by two. But once in a while, even I am pleasantly surprised when a product does exactly what is promised. This dual band wireless N wifi adapter is one such product. I made this purchase so that I could stream 1080p movies, with DTS or Dolby Digital 5.1 audio from a NAS 12ft away from my WDTV Live, which is directly wired into my Netgear WNDR3700. What this means is that I needed a card capable of ~25Mbps sustained through…
3) If you have different people in a selected area of the town and they all appear to have issues there, there may be a system problem.
Thanks to my dad for being the designated photographer of the week!
- Charles Burchfield at the Whitney: For some reason I had always assumed that Burchfield’s psychedelic landscapes developed after his ashcan-y depression-era period. The show at the Whitney set me straight on that one with an entire room dedicated to the early vibratory landscapes of 1915-1917. Starting around the 40’s Burchfield went back and added on to some of those paintings, carefully splicing new sheets of paper onto the originals and creating masterpieces at the scale of Abstract Expressionist canvases. Also revelatory were the extensive archives Burchfield established to document the progression of each painting.
Narrator to Matron: "Mary this production is a disaster. Could you bring papaya lozenges next time? I'm getting a nervous stomach."
Thank you to everyone who sent in snacks, supplies, flowers, gifts, and thank you notes last week during Teacher Appreciation Week. I enjoyed all of them very much and appreciate you taking the time to think of me!
Coors Brewing Company Coors Winterfest
“I can’t wait for the day that they’re all dead. I won’t be completely happy until I see our people free and Whitey dead.”
Under French law, an instruction judge is a magistrate responsible for conducting an investigative hearing to determine whether a case proceeds to criminal trial.
How long have you been writing poetry? as a songwriter and musician since the late 80s. As a blogging poet, since 2010
I gained these valuable insights but did I gain any more time? Well, the short answer is NO.
For the last several years I have challenged myself to focus on using from my pantry and shop less... a Panty Challenge. With the end of Febuary, this year's pantry challenge is complete but I have really enjoyed having a basic menu plan to guide me. I have decided to continue to make a month long menu, and be intentional about using garden produce and preserves from last season.
Left Hand Brewing Company Oak Aged Imperial Stout (Brandy Barrel)
Exclaimed to C3PO
The winners have been emailed and have 48 hours to respond or a new winner will be chosen.
As if on cue, after our day was done, the heavens opened and some water rained down like a shower of combined hydrogen and oxygen. The traffic slowed and we sloshed our way home, appreciating that timing was on our side and feeling particularly lucky we had had a good day and missed the really bad weather. I was glad of the day out
TAKE NOTICE: That you are warned to stop further communications with anyotherperson(s) or office(s) different from the staff of the State for Foreign andCommonwealth Affairs to avoid hitches in receiving your payment.
What do you get when you mix two brothers in their room , a rainy day, a favorite CD from the library, hours of free time, and a pair of sunglasses?
Hello! And welcome to another week of Artful Thursday. Just a reminder to check out Julie's blog and all the other wonderful chicks who participate in this weekly event. I'm sure you'll find something to spark your imagination and get you creating!
4) Sneak over to a neighbor's house and 'hide' the eggs in and around their yard.
In their tear-stained eyes
The tone, as in the earlier installments, is light and breezy, which seems to have distressed many on the blogosphere but which works perfectly well on its own terms and suits the ‘Raine’ character, a safe cracker who has joined the Doctor and Ace to probably make a buck and have a few laughs. And there are some really amusing characters, such as the Peter Lorre-style giant slugs (courtesy of Alex Mallinson), and the sentient planet is a great addition for the plot towards the end. As a conclusion to the series though it has to be said that this is no great shakes – a number of tantalising hints were dropped in previous stories (such as Raine wanting to investigate the mysterious death of her father, Ace’s potential apprenticeship on Gallifrey etc.) which aren’t really picked up here, perhaps deferred to further episodes should they ever come about (nothing’s been announced …). In addition the plot, while full of some great ideas, relies on some gigantic coincidences to work, which are acknowledged and shrugged off in the finale perhaps just a little too lightly.
Present Day – Nowadays, any cookbook with recipes for desserts will contain at least one version of the cheesecake. It’s become the common dessert that’s found at your local grocer’s freezer aisle. The Cheesecake Factory is a restaurant known nationwide in the U.S. for their wide variety of cheesecakes and desserts. It was a store that started in 1972 in Los Angeles, California with Evelyn and Oscar Overton with their dream of owning a store selling Evelyn’s delicious baked goods. In 1978, their son David founded The Cheesecake Factory restaurant in Beverly Hills, California. And now, within just 30 years, the Overton’s dream has far exceeded their expectations with 170 locations.
So when Gary drove up in this beauty, a two-thousand-something Mercury Grand Marquis--
Fireworks in the Shire:
Me: This isn't a trick question. I wanna know what celebrity you had the hots for, you know, besides Princess Leia.
Pro se litigants generally do not have an understanding of basic legal issues, the significance of the way things are phrased in pleadings and therefore are unable to distinguish between that which is central to the pleadings, that which is peripheral, or even simply, legal rhetoric. This means that they easily take umbrage at common legal formulations, and spend a great deal of time arguing about irrelevant issues. Recently a client’s husband felt humiliated when, in a custody and visitation suit, I asked the court to appoint a social worker to make recommendations about a visitation schedule. He saw this as both a threat and an insult, and interpreted it to mean that I was going to sic social services on him as a bad father. In fact, all I had done was use a standard formulation used in most visitation suits, and whether or not I ask for it, the judge will in all likelihood appoint a social worker to the case.
The sound rain makes when it hits a car windshield
And do not be conformed to this world, but be transformed by the renewing of your mind, that you may prove what is that good and acceptable and perfect will of God (Romans 12:2)
Tallying swizzle sticks and membranous limes,
We get pleasure from small things in this house so when YS went to the toilet this morning he was very excited to find...
She prays to God most every night
A life I gave, all to him, a heart to call his own, I did it all for him
Yeah, have I mentioned lately how happy I am I didn't marry into that family? OMG I wonder how many times I ate roadkill when my Loser Ex and I had dinner at his parent's house????
There she was, fluttering around up in the ceiling area, bouncing off the walls, hitting the windows. I was sure when I heard that first THUD that she was a total goner. Oh noooooo! Two birdie tragedies in a row. How were we ever going to manage this? My daughter wailed. My son covered his face. My husband and I looked at each other grimly.
of star-shine and dawn-scape
If the center of the low pressure would have been where the models forecast it Saturday night, these snowfall totals could have easily been over eastern Ohio and western PA. As for the rest of the night, as the low continues to progress away from the area, there is still some moisture available for some lake-effect rain or snow showers to impact the area. In fact, as of 835pm, a band of light precip was extending from Ashtabula into northern Trumbull counties in Ohio and Erie and Crawford counties in northwest PA. Meadville, PA in Crawford county was reporting light snow and 34 degrees at 8pm. Even if this band does make it into the Youngstown area, it won’t be a problem.
I thought I'd share part of the outline for the chapter on the (Strange) New World which is home to the City and several other locales I've mentioned here:
The worst hangovers I’ve have always come from strange local spirits. Necking moonshine from a jam jar with American rednecks after several pitchers of the cheapest domestic lager left me closest not only to death but wishing for death. My most stark memory of the evening was having a go at George Formby’s “When I’m cleaning windows”, on a drinking associates banjo (he didn’t have a ukulele) and being told the best place in England was “Scotchland”. I told him the best place in America was Sarah Michelle Gellar. By comparison fermented yaks milk is a delightful way of getting pissed even if it tastes foul. Sangria is another substance that I have banned from my body, it is neither big nor clever to neck several jugs of it and go on a donkey ride. Egyptian vodka & Egyptian Stella have the wonderful effect of keeping you drunk even when you wake up at 5am to go see some ancient historical crap the most interesting fact of which is that Roger Moore made a Bond film there. The hangover kicks in about noon and 2 bottles of the ice cold Stella calms it nicely. On a weekend in Dublin I discovered if no liquid but Guinness passes your lips, your poo turns jet black. My biggest problem is that whilst reasonably travelled for a working class northern pisshead I’ve not been everywhere. I need to get pissed everywhere in the world before making any sort of judgement on what is the best thing to get pissed on.
Last night, work was ugly. Not only was I tired going in, but we were slammed. Last week Austin-area hospitals ended the long-standing practice of going on diversion, which meant that when they were close to being full, ambulances were diverted to other hospitals. EMS hated it because it made for longer rides, less availability, and patient's directives on where they wanted to be treated were often overruled.
If it is true that there will be an offensive of Hezbollah and other satellites to reverse the international obligations by resorting to several undertakings, it is also true that other interests represented in the cabinet will nurture a different agenda.
Today's post is meant for all the Reese's Peanut Buttercup fans; and if I say so myself, I am one crazy peanut butter and chocolate lover. I love it not only on a slice of bread, even if I had to choose an ice-cream flavour to indulge in, PB and Chocolate is my No.1 go to sin. Yummm.. yummm.
Soon, I was asked if I wanted to speak.
After baking bread more and less steadily over the past few years, one thing that I've learned (and relearned): bread is forgiving. It's not usually difficult, and it rarely requires much hands-on work, but there is a fair amount of time waiting for the yeast to do its work raising the dough. This process can be manipulated, and a simple bread can be baked in increments over a day or two rather than in one long session.
And where the blessed dance;
This was a lot of fun! These molds are really nice. They appear to be made of a thick slab of silicon. They are easy to clean and are very bendy. Love the colors! I dusted the cavities with powdered sugar using my pastry brush and tapped out any excess.
— Read more in Eric A Davidson, “Representative concentration pathways and mitigation scenarios for nitrous oxide,” Environmental Research Letter (12 April 2012) (doi:10.1088/1748-9326/7/2/024005)
Preheat the oven to 350 degrees. Coat a muffin tray with cooking spray or line with paper cups.
Larry Doby - U.S. Navy
1 warmth
exchange on the parallel market.
Thank you so much for your prayers, and continue to do so. We appreciate your prayers and encouragement in our obedience to carry out the great commission. God bless you!
It was Tuesday or Wednesday that I realized he had triggered a PTSD (post traumatic stress disorder) episode in me.
In re BP Lubricants UA Inc., Misc. Docket No. 960 (Fed. Cir., March 15, 2011)
Yes that is my GOAL… I NEED to be addicted to being awesome. Right now my addictions are WANTING bad foods. It doesn’t mean I always eat bad foods, but I WANT them so to make up for it I find Paleo-ish sweeties and it’s not helping me. I told Coach I was doing the 21-Day Sugar Detox and he about looked at me like I had 3 heads. He asked/stated “Shouldn’t you already pretty much have cut out sugar?” And I say well ya but I still bake with the now KNOWN LIQUID DEATH NECTAR – AGAVE! And Ernie thinks I eat too much fruit. And I’ve been having too many “cheat bites”. I also let everyone become aware of what a damn headcase I am. I’m pretty sure they already know it or assumed it but now they KNOW for certain. SOOOO I will do the detox, see if my cravings for the bad stuff goes away. We shall see. So back to the point (maybe?) Coach tells me I should just be addicted to being awesome! Hahahha! That was good and then I thought SURE why not? I will become addicted to AWESOMENESS and not just plain ol awesome but BEING AWESOME!
I want to lose the weight because it will make my running a lot easier. I also want to lose weight because, like most American women, I don’t like the way my body looks unclothed-from the waist down.
Blueberry Muffins:
I’ve been a wee bit quiet, and have fallen behind in the whole 20 Days of WoW thing, but it’s been a bit mad, combined with mild burnout. And an Easter surprise I really didn’t expect.
we dun even have years back stories to tell coz
The Lord said there is someone here tonight, he said take a proper record of where you are now, he said because I am about to take you far.
Headline Publishing Group
Beth will be participating in the Dallas Running Club‘s White Rock ‘n’ Roll 10 mile race on Saturday! Need to burn those calories before she and Brent are off to do a cake tasting! Neither one of us have ever done a 10 mile race and honestly it’s starting to get HOT in Texas! Hopefully White Rock Lake can provide some sort of a breeze!
I received an email today informing me that Ween is coming to St. Petersburg, FL in October, two hours from where I live, so I knew it was a sign that I had to post this. It will be the second time I see them live and I am so psyched about it.
Good for him.
"Tickets? Tickets? You wee shites got any tickets?"
"No, what are you doing in the toilet?"
Carmel at Our Fifth House has been slowly updating her kitchen (and teasing us mercilessly along the way!), but the final reveal was worth every post of torture....gorgeous!
Well that’s all you get. I don’t want to give too much away. Just go see it! You know you want to. Even if by some chance you haven’t read the books you can totally enjoy it as an individual movie. I can’t wait to see it again. If you’ve seen it already tell me what you think. If you have tickets tell me what you’re most looking forward to. Share your thoughts on my review. Oh and if it’s not clear…
If that bothers UC fans, maybe they should win something in the next generation or two. Seriously, 1962 was a LONG time ago. If Reds fans are willing to jump ship because the team chooses to honor a team in blue in an effort to reach out to more fans, then the franchise is better off without them.
Yay!!! I've finally got around to sharing one of the SWALK winter cheer images with you!! I'm also entering my card into the following challenges:
The Cycle Pub, as it’s called, carries 12 peddling riders, six on each side of what’s essentially a long bar. The contraption carries the riders from brewery to brewery.
They are declaring Wildrose leader Smith is “untested, untried and unfit” to lead. Or they suggest she is an “extremist” or a bigot.
Jo xx
“Capital is always a problem,” says Echoing Green Finance Director John Walker, adding that “the first thing any entrepreneur thinks about is raising money.” That’s where Echoing Green comes in — it’s a seed-funding foundation that has disseminated $31 million to ambitious social entrepreneurs.
Seating is limited so RSVP today!
Looks innocent enough...
Children from the ages of 7 and up will love this new hard cover book in this comic book series. The story is adventurous and provides lots of historic bits throughout concerning the printing presses and Johannes Gutenberg. The story stays true to the series and is filled with Geronimo’s humor and wit. Fans of comic books will love the detailed illustrations that Papercutz is known for providing.
Cardstock: Stamper's Select White by PaperTrey Ink
Lisa lent me her leoprint top :3
Early indications (i have not seen the stream results yet) are that BN won 55% of Malay votes, 68% of Indians and a mere 28% of Chinese votes.
both of my parents worked long hours, so i was left to marlboro lights, box wine, and a frightening imagination.
Stephen McGill
For the idiots who keep defending the PMs hiring of her sister….let me repeat slowly….there is no position called travel assistant…and according to the TnT Mirror’s recent lead story….Vidwattie is not a registered nurse. So, let me hear all yuh? How all yuh defending this abuse of state funds? In what capacity Vidwattie actually travelling with her sister if travel assistant doesn’t exist as a post and she is not registered to practise as a nurse?
Skin:
Hong Kong Garden, Siouxie and The Banshees
I am just a glowing ember. With hope that my fire can once again be alight, but for now I just sit nestled in the pit of what was once a blazing fire.
Remind us that we are each made in Your image
Yesterday, I started my day off with an 8 AM meeting with the middle school principal. The topic: playground football. Football (actually, all play involving footballs) has recently been banned from recess at the middle school. I wanted to know why. The answer? Injuries, aggressive behavior and liability.
1 Lisa Murphy W Saugus 7:24.4 23:00.60
We are so excited to meet baby girl!
5. Once they splatter, add chopped onions and fry for a min. Add ginger garlic paste and fry for 1 more min.
I have always wanted to have the means to change other people’s lives, but for most of my life I assumed that you needed to be wealthy to make a big difference. Being part of these projects has taught me that it’s not true. You don’t need a ton of money. All you need is some time, effort, and teamwork. Thank you to United Way and to HandsOn Inland Empire for helping to teach me this lesson and for letting me be a part of the these events!
3. Why do people have mid-life crises? (Maybe that’s answered in 1 and 2…)
Went from Usher in London to Bjork in Paris
We will be sure to keep everyone updated and would appreciate many thoughts and prayers sent her way. She is a miracle and she is fighting. We are so grateful as this could have been a lot worse. Welcome to the world sweet girl.
“And in those days Peter stood up in the midst of the disciples, and said (the number of names together were about an hundred and twenty).”
The Atlantic Yards development project was first proposed in 2003 by real estate developer Forest City Ratner. The construction plan includes a basketball stadium for the New Jersey Nets, high-rise condominiums, and new commercial spaces, and the demolition of established local businesses and existing homes. The groundbreaking for the development project occurred in March, 2010 after seven years of negotiations, legal battles, and community protests. The New York Court of Appeals' decision permitted the use of eminent domain.
Don't really see the downside to this game:).
“Yes. Um… sorry.”
The wind whipped through my hair and against my face, my feelings of terror were replaced by exhilaration until…why am I slowing down so soon..?
"No, Sir," I whispered, not sure if I was more excited or terrified.
She reads very impressively.
If we look at the population of Great Britain under the age of 40 it is as follows:
Also gives me a chance to revisit some photos that I have not seen for ages.
Our current challenge, Punches and Diecuts for Kids is open for you to enter until September 2nd at noon CST, so pull out your punches and/or dies and make a cute card for a child and enter it for THREE chances at some great prizes! And after you do, please consider sending that card and any others you have appropriate for children into Send a Smile 4 Kids so we can put a smile on the faces of children who are inpatient in Children's Hospitals and cheer their families as well. All the information you need is under the tabs above.
* The repetitive ‘rehearsed’ interviews given to the press by Diallo’s ‘brother’
This response reflects a rather arrogant and ignorant attitude. It loads all the burden of documenting and explaining data manipulation onto whistleblowers. Some journal editors are simply not prepared to live up to their responsibilities and take a fair share of the investigative work.
It was lovely and hot in Biarritz that week. Sadly however work was the order of the day and so I could only manage to get to the sea quite late. Luckily it was still hot and sunny, less luckily the tide was coming in making swimming a bit iffy.
What is more unethical? Denying screening? Denying treatment? Or needing any of coverage or eligibilities in the first place?
Like Cameron, Feldman got a First in his final exams; then he took a job with management consultants Bain & Co. before, in 1991, being called to the Bar and practising as a commercial barrister at one of the country’s top chambers.
It was a good day and I had fun. Which was very welcome to say the least.
New Delhi railway station,
We've had a wonderful day just spending time with our baby girl. Mary Grace met her church family today. She was awake during the entire service and never made a peep! My sweet husband gave me a Pandora bracelet with 2 charms- a baby carriage charm and the mother/daughter heart charm. In case you didn't know, I have the best husband and the sweetest daughter in the world- if I do say so myself!
“We’re putting in place a standard that relies on the use of clean, American made technology to tackle a challenge that we can’t leave to our kids and grandkids,” EPA Administrator Lisa Jackson told reporters in a teleconference.
The rosta for the night meant most of us were left extremely exhausted. I had to stick in one packed out room just so I wouldn’t miss a succession of hip hop maverics. Ramson Badbonez took to the stage early, after having Cracker Jon and 2late warm up the crowd. We also had the pleasure of hearing verses from Skuff, Kyza (who possibly blew up one of his lungs in one of the most heated earlier sets), Contact Play and Buggsy. Now, the head act of the night were undeniably The Four Owls.
After the party we ran our errands and ate dinner at Pepperjax. Then we came home and Heath and I actually watched a movie. Like a whole movie from beginning to end. We were trying to figure out the last time we did that, and I am not sure I could tell you. We watched The Descendants. It was pretty good, but it was kind of slow and I was hoping for more information at the end. It was one of those movies where it just ends and leaves you wanting more information.
DON’T ALLOW MAN TO PLANT SOUR, EXPIRED SEEDS IN YOUR GARDEN OF SERVING GOD…
Favorite Quote: “Find a way to win” by my coach Steve Sampson at Santa Clara. Also: “It’s not the end of the world. My dog will still lick my face whether I win or lose.” – Michael Biondi, Olympic champion.
If you're wondering where wanting to speak Korean came from, it's from a song we like. She also likes the singer, because he dances well and dresses "fancy." I'm glad she changed it to Spanish, because I know three words in Korean (yes, no, thank you). And I am totally confused by the characters.
this is another old job i did a couple of years ago...
I brushed the dreams within your hair
Put another way, the whole point of living in Paris for a year is to let others know that you are the kind of person who might well have lived in Paris.
Donating; all our clothes that don’t fit anymore we donate. We also did a big pantry inventory and decide to give food to the food kitchen. Since we are going in a trailer for two months, we have to eat what we have right now so we are not crowded and only have basics.
Safely installed in a new town, a new life in front of me, I started to reflect, thinking about the past events. Slowly I started to pic up the peaces from what I had left behind of my personality, I was still very depressed. And slowly my soul begun a major repair job, or why not call it a reconstruction of what people had annihilated. It wasn’t totally lost. I started to read the Scriptures again, slowly, hesitating, resting on every word and syllable. I cried a lot during this time, but it was okey. I knew I would eventually return to life. The medicine was school work alternated with long bike rides in a beautiful rural countryside. It was like a caring and healing bandage for my soul.
The first layer of actual security that greets travellers at Tel Aviv's Ben Gurion International Airport is a roadside check. All drivers are stopped and asked two questions: How are you? Where are you coming from?
My broccoli is all done and I tore it out. What do I put there?
They gave a drunk civilian room, but ‘adn’t none for me.
until that perfect will be revealed in us.
I finally convinced myself to get out of bed to find the repellent. I found the shelf where we had left it without making too much noise and jumped back into bed in a similar fashion to the way I did when I still believed there were monsters living underneath it. After reapplying the cream to every piece of exposed flesh, I also convinced myself that it would be best to sleep underneath the sheet despite the heat. Oh, do I hate these little bugs.
Chat date: April 18, 2012
Now, to what could he possibly be referring?
And one surgery later, I now know why.
“Ma’am, which book were you looking for?”
So my reason for thinking it is important for us to use the term "formalism" to talk about types of criticism that are primarily (if not exclusively) concerned with form rather than content (as a strategic dichotomy if not an entirely false one) is that formalist criticism likely undermines and perhaps even obliterates the borders between SF and not-SF.
Starkwell watched the story unfold with great enthusiasm. Lovelock was less enthused, but every time he wanted to make a comment like “where’s the action?” or “where’s the beef?” Starkwell would shush him like a librarian on crack. Is there any other kind? However, they both make fun of Professor Pullman’s philosophical narration every chance that they get.
Knowing that hers is going to fall out around 13 days after the first chemo treatment (which is tomorrow), Karla took the initiative and got a short cut a couple of days ago. It's really adorable. But in a few days, her husband is going to shave it all off for her. It's kind of empowering--to take the hair off before it falls out. "I’m so not in control right now," Karla admits. "I have very little control of my life." So she's going to get the jump on the hair thing. "It will be a shock," she says candidly, "and I know I will be emotional, but it is what it is. There’s nothing I can do about it. Hopefully, I will have a nice-shaped head."
1 refactorization
Schirmbeck raised questions about the purchases in January, and members of the city council agreed there appears to be a legal problem. The city will refund a few of the items and seek an attorney general’s opinion on whether the other purchases are a problem.
That I had spun myself
The report revealed, “one conference served $16 muffins while another served Beef Wellington hors d’oeuvres that cost $7.32 per serving. Coffee and tea at the events cost between $0.62 and $1.03 an ounce. At the $1.03 per-ounce price, an 8-ounce cup of coffee would have cost $8.24.”
Brothes in the bathtub having a good old time splashing Mommy & Daddy and themselves!
we choose to call a world. Encore.
i'm too afraid
5. If you are looking for specific information on forms, terms or coverage try our insurance glossary page. Most MGA/Wholesaler sites don’t catalog this info on their sites unless it is a very common question so you may be disappointed in search results alone.
Listening to... We Float - PJ Harvey
Combine water and Farro in a medium sauce pan. Add salt, and bring to a boil. Then reduce heat and simmer over medium low for 15-20 minutes, Covered. Drain if any moisture is remaining. (I have made a few times and never had any remaining water.) Transfer to a large glass bowl. Allow to cool. Add all remaining ingredients and mix. My husband and I love it fresh at room temperature but it taste great cold too.
I am no painter and I know it; what I do get, however, is paper, and how one can create spectacular designs using it. So to realize this dream of mine, I resorted to Scherenschnitte, the German art of paper-cutting to make some Girih patterns. These patterns have painstakingly been 100% hand-cut (if you look closely, you might be able to spot the flaws), but it was all worthwhile. Hope you enjoy feasting your eyes on them as I enjoyed cutting them.
Shake silicon ass.
DBKL and Bersih 3.0 organisers are deadlocked over Dataran Merdeka as the venue for the rally, with either side refusing to yield on their respective stands.
Here is the plot:
Suitcases it is! I’ve this Senegalese suitcase (actually from Goree Island which has a bleak a history as apartheid). The case is made from tuna tins and is lined with comics of hyena’s speaking French. Inspirational enough for a Gifted and Talented Year 9 or 10?
Last month I found Grey Luster Girl's framed thread holder tutorial on pinterest and flipped out! I knew I was going to try this as soon as I saw it, just with my own little spin! :)
What this did in turn was not dissimilar to the acculturation process that took place in Java in the 15th and 16th-Centuries when Islam was spread by the famous Wali Songo. These nine famous Muslim preachers used Javanese in their sermons, adapting their message to local customs and practices.
My masseur entered the room after faintly knocking on the door. He informed me of his every move—putting me at ease as he massaged the tension from each part of my body.
Much Love,
Then, place the stuffed cabbage wrap on the sizzling plate/tava.Mix one tablespoon oil and one tablespoon water and spread over the stuffed cabbage to get the sizzling effect.
Husband brought home some papers from work today and said he has to fill them out and return them sometime this week. I took pics to post of 3 of the pages, but want to give a brief background before I attach them. I hope you can understand what I try to convey, but I’m a little agitated right now! It’s actually so absurd to me that it’s kinda funny. I dunno, like I said earlier, maybe I’m just out of touch.
Riots are the exclusive domain of those who view themselves as outside the law. Whether they are outside the law because they are above or below it is a matter of perspective. The rioters may see themselves as the oppressed who are below the law while their victims tend to think of them as above the law, with the power to rob and kill, without paying any significant price for it. All that is true whether we are talking about Russian peasants killing Jews, Indonesians killing ethnic Chinese or African-Americans killing whites.
Congratulations to Jessica & Eric! We can’t wait to see the first pic of baby Maxwell.
2Co 2:14-16 NET. But thanks be to God who always leads us in triumphal procession in Christ and who makes known through us the fragrance that consists of the knowledge of him in every place. (15) For we are a sweet aroma of Christ to God among those who are being saved and among those who are perishing — (16) to the latter an odor from death to death, but to the former a fragrance from life to life. And who is adequate for these things?
My card is made of scraps from another project (that I will be showing you soon) and of course I had to use a small scrap to paper piece her dress. I just think she is super cute!
I no longer have to grab that one thing at the grocery store.
By the way, I wholeheartedly recommend reading such books as the Chicken Soup: Runners or Accidental Athlete, because when you see that ordinary people went from 0 to 5K+ then you see that you can do it too. I’m already fighting insecurities, doubts, and bad memories but I find those stories inspire me to go through with my running; just today a little voice in the back of my head told me I didn’t have to go to the park, reminded me of all the kids in high-school, the way my thighs jiggled with each step, etc, etc – but I hushed that voice up with a couple Mississippis of stretching and walked out my door.
This first part follows Angelou’s childhood in the American South in the 1930s. After their parents’ divorce, she and her brother Bailey are sent to live with their grandmother in Stamps, Arkansas. Angelou feels ugly compared to the white children, even the “powhite folks”, and does not feel equal to the other black children either. At first, the book seems to have the childlike innocence of To Kill a Mockingbird — a child observing racism but unable to understand it. The tone of the book becomes steadily more horrible and disturbing as Angelou encounters more racism and abuse.
"Hey man, we shouldotally get McOnalds!"
Cardstock: Always Artichoke, Bravo Burgundy, Very Vanilla, Early Espresso.
-- insert too thin
What benefits have you found through blogging?
4. mash this topping down onto the apples, packing it onto the fruit to make a smooth top.
Man, what an eye opener that was. To think of placing my mother in some of these places had me breaking down in tears many times. Is this what life comes to? Why does it have to be this way?
By and Copyright to M.A.P. 1385
Odyssey: a long wandering or voyage usually marked by many changes of fortune: an intellectual or spiritual wandering or quest.
A Turning Point in the Consciousness in Matter
I think that's really cool.
Scourge also features brief appearances by other species associated with service to the Hutts, the most prominent of which was the Rodians, but most interesting was the detailed description of the Nikto and the subspecies of Nikto.
RB (Start 2): Tim Hightower, Ray Rice, DeMarco Murray
One frighteningly critical, but too often overlooked aspect of the fighting load-out is personal protective equipment (PPE), which goes beyond just ballistic protection. This includes eye protection.
Standing next to him is RAF02807 Flanagan - SWAT Team Sergeant. Flanagan is armed and equipped in an identical manner to "The Man" but his carbine has a scopesight fitted to it. I can only assume that Flanagan and "The Man" are bare-headed to make them stand out as team leaders. It makes little sense for them not to wear some form of head protection.
THE PRESIDENT: I do not see a path to a deal if they don’t budge, period. I mean, if the basic proposition is “it’s my way or the highway,” then we’re probably not going to get something done because we’ve got divided government. We’ve got Democrats controlling the Senate; we probably are going to need Democratic votes in the House for any package that could possibly pass. And so if, in fact, Mitch McConnell and John Boehner are sincere — and I believe they are — that they don’t want to see the U.S. government default, then they’re going to have to compromise just like Democrats are going to have to compromise; just like I have shown myself willing to compromise.
Before you can join the Laurens County Republican Party in South Carolina and get on the primary ballot, they ask that you pledge that you’ve never ever had pre-marital sex — and that you will never ever look at porn again.
beautiful but useless.
pass the information along to any high school seniors and college students
dj: "you don't like the music?"
One of the very few good good outcomes of that scourge is Nada's "L'amore è fortissimo e il corpo no". It's not an orthodox representative of the trend, but it's a very good album indeed, and the influence of straighter "alternative" styles is evident. Basically, it's a singer/songwriter work, with very mature and raw lyrics depicting problematic lives and destitute conditions. More than narrating or describing, the songs "furnish" the space with sounds and scattered images, making you perceive the very mood of the situations.
But my heart wept from the cruelty of childish torment.
The auction, which in fact raised money to buy Pinky her freedom, gained nationwide attention at the time and helped illuminate the inhumanity of slavery. Bergmann’s bust of Pinky (pictured at top) is accented with poison ivy, because “it’s infectious and insidious like racism…and it affects the skin,” Bergmann explained.
At Google I/O, we announced that Android Market is coming to Google TV. Today, we’re announcing a preview of the Google TV Add-on for the Android SDK. With the upcoming OS update to Honeycomb, Google TV devices will be Android compatible. That means developers can build great new Android apps for TV, optimize existing mobile or tablet apps for TV, and distribute those apps through Android Market.
After pitting the peppers, I rinsed them off to get any of the seeds that I had missed, and began cutting them into strips.
Biggest thing has been my exciting trip to the dermatologists a few weeks ago. What I thought was just going to be a quick trip for a refill on meds turned into a full-blown skin check. And that ended in the doctor saying to me “Well, I think I’m going to biopsy this one. And…. this one over here. And this one. And then just this last one. Ok?”
+(real life, Nip/Tuck #65) Just as Clint started to floss, the character Christian said “floss”, unexpectedly.
Whether that's with a diligent employee named Amber, who has a smile that lights up a room, or with a beautiful and perfect Lily...
`Cause I can look inside your head.
The theme for the FreeRepublic gathering was a salute to the late Andrew Breitbart, who was a member of the conservative website at one time. "Breitbart Is Here" (as seen in the sidebar) T-shirts were worn and signs were held.
At the age of 5 he declared that he would be a marine biologist. Around the same time we had taken a spring break trip to the St. Louis area. Naturally, having a kid so into animals, the zoo was high on the list of places to go.
Dominique moved Elijah’s arm away from her shoulders and took a few steps towards me. It wasn’t long till we were face to face.
We've all done it: made a fool of ourselves at the work Christmas party. We have, haven't we?
The ruling party is a broad church, with its base of support ranging from radical leftists to business tycoons. But it has been in crisis for several years due to the infighting between the Zuma and Mbeki camps.
MUSIC: B
Chris 'The Moniker' Werst comes by her alias honestly. She misses nothing. At beaches, Galleries, tourist attractions... she retains everything. She is very proficient at finding out and remembering names of people, places and things. She uses this to her advantage. She will call your name and then act like she knows you... by the time you realize she is a stranger it is too late... you are digitally immortalized and destined to become canvas bound.
Nosferatu isn’t funny all the way through—especially after Orlock sails for Hutter’s German home town and brings the plague to every port he stops at along the way. Nor is it ever ‘scary,’ at least, in the Halloween (1978)-sense. Nosferatu’s modern descendants are films like The Exorcist (1973), which excel at maintaining feelings of unease through the distortion of the mundane. Murnau delivers us familiar objects, actions and environments, but always with a twist that makes them abnormal. Sometimes this involves camera tricks, but more often, the context is enough.
Me: 'Are you going to have a good night?'
There was a bewildering assortment of false starts and incomplete sentences for the mind only. I no sooner thought of something to say to myself than I forgot it, and I was lucky to get beyond the second or third imagined word. Of course no one in his right mind overheard any of this, the dumb speaking to the silent in a reverse image, so no one was upset. But if this happens 50 or 60 times, one wants a little revenge of some sort. Of course, one was in all probability speaking no kind of written English, so this meant that whatever you said was relevant and you could not say anything irrelevant.... Reading, at which I used to be no slouch, now gave me the most incredible, disheveled experiences of my print-bound life. Now print jigged toward me, then it hung back. The one part of it that was readable swam backward or forward to render the reading experience at best incomplete, or subject to the vilest, maddest vagaries of a proofreader’s nightmare.So far I am thoroughly enjoying West's post-stroke prose, and find it much more focused and readable than Ackerman's, so perhaps I'll be content with having heard her radio voice, which seems to absorb better, and in my Amazon shopping cart I'll trade her book for The Shadow Factory.
Easter is linked to the Jewish Passover by much of its symbolism, as well as by its position in the calendar. In many languages, the words for “Easter” and “Passover” are etymologically related or homonyms. Easter customs vary across the Christian world, but decorating eggs is a common one. In the United States, customs such as egg hunting and the Easter Bunny extend from the church and are considered secular.
2. Creation of uniform Web address system of all the Railway Websites
Would the Establishment be willing to bomb cities in the West using their paid fanatics in their Al Qaeda units? Of course they would. Would they be willing to carry out false flag operations and blame the Pakistanis for them? New York 11/9/1, Madrid 11/3/4 and London 7/7/5 answer that question. Would a war against Pakistan be used to fuel unrest in Europe as an excuse to bring in the Police State complete with concentration camps? I wouldn't doubt it for a moment.
In an attempt to distance E-TV from this deplorable programme Vasili Vass, E-TV head of publicity said, "The broadcast of Naked News has nothing to do with E-News, it is completely sponsor funded."
Concentrate. Expect Confusion. The early pattern may elude you. Don’t quit. Each piece that fits is a promise.
However, while free thought can often lead to contrarian ideas, it can also lead to great ideas and magnificent accomplishments, the sort of which we are used to seeing come out of these United States. Dr. Wendler is indeed correct in saying that the encouragement of free thought is by nature one of the essential roles of higher education. I cannot help but think that by questioning the importance of higher education, we place the long term prospects of our nation at peril.
And you can see some of what Mr. Esposito is doing in Las Vegas, with this YouTube video interview with CBS News mainstay Steve Kroft, honored by the RTDNA with the 2010 "Paul White Award":
I’m only going to dye one of the grays. I decided to spin both samples. I found that the brownish-gray was by far the easiest for me to spin. Remember, I just started spinning about 2 months ago. Here is both of the spun samples. Top: Brownish-gray sample, Bottom: Gray Norwegian Top. So what do you think?
Also a few cultural references had me wondering and I had to enquire from more informative sources as to what was meant by the writer.
Despite having filed a complaint with every single member of the Ohio legislature, Attorney General, Secretary of State and Governor BEFORE enforcement rules were finalized in April of 2007, and notwithstanding an amended complaint being filed in November 2009 that disclosed even more detail surrounding the fraud and highly questionable procedures undertaken to ensure that the "Smoke Free Work Place Act" would appear on the November 2006 ballot, NO formal investigation has been announced to date, or at the very least, no investigation has been made known in the main stream media regarding the allegations charged in those complaints.
~Each month I would like to sew a new outfit and mend an old one.
-haven't bought one Christmas present yet
On my island within an island, beyond my Chinese seawall,
McCain/Palin ticket and start being for the Obama/Biden one.
However, this is not to say that I think that Joe Biden shouldn't mop the floors with her in the debate. If she's in this, I say, let her be IN THIS, and if she doesn't know her shit, then let the chips fall where they may.
was writing swears.)
Thought for the Day: The price of a little bruised pride is nothing compared to the price He paid on the cross.
An aspect that I found very appealing in this field is the creation of software in robotics and mechatronic technologies. While most companies will ask for a minimum of a B.S. in computer science with classes in AI, the Bureau of Labor Statistics states that only an associate degree is required for those who are more focused on the robotics aspect of this field.
If this was Bush, the whole world would be up in arms. But Obama is letting these people away with murder - literally - and whilst people are talking about it, nobody's causing that much of a fuss.
I get to the register tell the lady Im exchanging dress A for dress B but I have no receipt because dress A was a gift. The lady lets me know that Express no longer does instore credits so that I would need to spend the $30 now or I would lose it. SHE CLEARLY GIVES ME THE OPTION TO JUST TAKE THE DRESS AND LOSE $30. Of course I dont want to do that, so I leave the register and go look for something that will get me close to the amount because I really didnt want to spend any money. I was absolutely okay with my new purchase being LESS than the old and NOT receiving a refund.
I’m afraid that there is a new destructive breed within nationalism, infusing its poison, destroying the mere chance of a movement for change.
Cream Cheese Layer:
All the novels hanging around me need a setting, and up to now I’ve only paid attention to the characters, their relationships and dialogue. I am like a bottle of wine that becomes wiser with age – the years adding layers of flavour and rich colour. Now I have the missing element.
I did do some things I hadn't been planning on but that were pretty awesome. For example, I got to teach my niece the best scary story to tell at her first sleepover. You know the one I'm talking about - "The Call is Coming From Inside the House!!" She's seven years old, so I didn't make it too scary. I told her the story because she asked me what I did at sleepovers when I was a kid. I didn't tell her about putting people's bras in the freezer*, putting their fingers in warm water when they're sleeping to make them pee (does that actually work?), prank calling boys (pre-caller ID), or playing games like "Light as a Feather, Stiff as a Board", or "Bloody Mary." All I told her was that we played games, ate junk food, and told scary stories. Did you have a favorite scary story when you were a kid?
But another problem arose, I didn't bleed after sex and he was convinced I hadn't been a virgin after all! I started remebering bits and pieces:
As Menma hears her conversation, she remembers the rocket they once tried to make and failed when they were kids. She was the first to say about the rocket. Soon she understands Jintan just started working to make money for her wish.
find the axe growing
we followed, planting the slips of trees,
Lord you have a plan for me. I trust in you. But please take this sadness away from my heart, I can’t cope with this feeling anymore.
What have I done
...BASED ON A TRUE STORY
Ash grasped his hand and screamed. She began to glow with power. Her body trembled as magic filled it, washing through her veins with golden light. Dark lines traced across her skin turning into an image on her chest which Ronan recognized as Eventide’s back tattoo. The lines filled out showing a wide-eyed child lost in a forest as the sun gave way to darkness. The hand Ronan held burned as a servant tattoo covered it – the image of a window into the night sky. Mara’s sign. Mara’s servant tattoo. Ronan’s daughter served the witch who killed her predecessor and the boy she loved. Ronan felt sick. Sick in the pit of his stomach, whatever he ate last threatened to come back up.
(Note : he received a little bit of my help to be there. I arranged the blanket around him..)
11/23 UPDATE: On November 21st, the U.S. Senate Democrats got a “fililbuster proof 60 votes that will allow them to bring their version of health care reform to the Senate floor for debate.” While the vote is considered historic, the passage of this bill is in no way a sure thing. Read here for complete details from the Examiner.com.
Vegetarian? Include one or two tablespoons of ground flaxseed in your daily diet for some plant-based omega-3 fats.
I imagined the Afghan soldiers standing by, helpless, while Destroyer destroyed. I thought of attacks over the past several years in which Afghan policemen or soldiers had suddenly turned on their NATO allies and opened fire. Such betrayals have been increasing. Sometimes the Taliban claim responsibility for them, but often it seems the assailants have been taking revenge on foreign soldiers for some perceived insult to their honor. It was not hard to envision the seeds of such an attack sown in the ruts of Destroyer’s visit.
So obviously i went for the red and green theme with snowflakes!! hehe!
Though Paris may not be as big as other major international hot spots like New York, or London, they have one thing in common: TOO MANY DAMN BARS. Should I go here? There? NO, no wait. Someone said this place was better than that place. And then there's that new one that just opened up, it's getting rave reviews. But should I trust them? Do we have similar taste? Do they know what the hell they're talking about or is it all just buzz?
If I am ever fortunate enough to be published, I won’t mind (occasionally) seeing my books in charity shops. We pass on as much as we can to be resold in aid of charity (mostly to Cancer Research, for whom my eldest daughter volunteers) and I’d feel no differently about books I’d written rather than bought being sold second-hand to benefit a charity. I really hope that one day I’ll have a better understanding of what it means to be published and whether seeing one’s own work in a charity shop is satisfying, annoying, or both.
That sucks.
this life
"Oh, that's all just a giant act. Deep down, hidden from public view, we're basically an evil superpower."
Janice Gaines wrote the familiar refrain of “One Day,” and simply sang it around the house to encourage herself, until she took it to writing partners Alvin Love III and Dwan Hill. The trio completed the song, which was produced by Hill (for Crystal City, Inc.) and Love. The result is a refreshing gospel anthem that stands out and resonates with every heart.
According to the Yorkshire Evening Post, the shop owners were told the centre had become 'unviable'. Some said they had been given until January 14 to move out and those with longer contracts had until May.
The photos of what I wore today are really shit, I do apologise. I meant to take them outside earlier in the day, but forgot, then had stuff to do, and didn't take them till the light had faded and they are all blurry. Such a professional, that's me.
I think TELEtoon Retro should add more '80s cartoons, if only to balance the sad sad state of affairs Saturday morning 'toons find themselves in these days. Here are some of my suggestions:
b. display means connected to the scanner for receiving the appearance signals and aesthetic correction circuitry for interactively introducing aesthetically desired alterations into said appearance signals to produce modified appearance
Those wandering beasts cannot understand you
Anyway, I'm sorry I've been neglecting you, my first love. I'm gonna attempt to make a change...straight away. :)
Believe me…most employees already know what to do with the own time…
A few critics have laid down fairly clear normative criteria for poetry. Yvor Winters, for example, comes to mind—and it is perhaps worth noting that in addition to being a poet and critic, he bred show dogs and had them evaluated by criteria much like those applied to cattle. But the rare exceptions prove the rule: normative criteria for poetry are unusual, and
Add the nearly one thousand Dewey lawyers who have been watching quietly at the unfolding public relations nightmare since Davis’s bizarre interview. As Dewey’s publicity machine pumps out celebrity saviors of the moment, each has drawn more unwanted attention to the firm’s plight than the last. Martin Bienenstock’s appearance in the Times along with the proffered “pre-packaged bankruptcy” option is the latest example.
Silky, sable hairs tremble sweetly to the rhythm of the dance...
We started our day weighing our our rations.
1 recipe vanilla pastry cream (see end of post for recipe)
The latest survey data has revealed that the number one thing on Australian employees’ minds is job security – questions about salary and other benefits pale in comparison to this one key factor. The survey from recruitment and consultancy firm Randstad canvassed the opinions of more than 7,000 Australian professionals who nominated the most important factor influencing their job satisfaction.
My friends, it is this same fiendish horseradish that has come back to life this year! The flock has determined that it is indeed a mutant and quite possibly a zombie vegetable. We are in full research mode to learn all we can about horseradish and/or zombie removal, but until that time the whole flock is on high alert! Any tips you readers may have regarding your experiences dealing with horseradish or zombies would be greatly appreciated! We have also sent an emergency message to Uncle Bubba in Louisiana, as we have heard there are many zombies who live in and around the swamps!
Living here in Mineral Point has been interesting what with The Red Rooster and Gray Dog cafes and people who actually write Haiku and/or Renku and tales of vampires jumping out of trees and up from under a boat dock on the only lake in the county.
(MLK disappears in a puff of smoke.)
Man City v Tottenham – 1.30 Sunday (Live on Sky Sports 1)
But if you’re recycling dead bodies, then the man who scumbles all the body parts into air, water, plants and delicious food products is our pal Shatner Posey.
ND - Yeah. I agree.
40g Corn Oil
We find our way to a rather modest meeting room, and about 100 of us space ourselves out comfortably to listen to the Keynote Session. This can't possibly be all of us. Well, no; YJB is still not in sight, that's one more. Perhaps many others are lurking in their rooms getting their presentations in order, or recovering from jetlag. Although, the room won't even seat more than 150 so we must be close to all here.
A great deal of what gets the “Yea” or “Nay” vote as far as polytheistic practice goes, particularly in communities that use a reconstructionist methodology, is notions of “cultural purity.” In reality, almost every culture that has ever existed, which has not been completely isolationist in its tendencies (and very few have been able to do true isolationism for more than a century or two at a time), has been interested in and cooperative with other cultures that border, surround, or are adjacent to it. Trade happens, and when trade happens, new objects and technologies get shared, and the vocabulary to go along with them, as well as infinitely other small and subtle things. And, particularly in premodern and polytheistic periods where religion and everyday life didn’t get separated from one another as easily, religious matters also got traded back and forth. Take the Gundestrup Cauldron above, for example. Most people consider it one of the greatest treasures of “Celtic” visual culture, at least from the Continental Celtic area and period. And yet, no matter what can be said about it in terms of its visual depictions and the possible mythic or narrative content of it, it is of definitely Thracian workmanship, or, at very worst, Gallo-Thracian workmanship. And, it was found disassembled in a Danish bog, which is well out of the usual “Continental Celtic” geographic range. Something as definitively Celtic as the Gundestrup Cauldron, therefore, brings up all sorts of questions when it comes to syncretism and to external cultural influence. All of the Celtic cultures that are identifiable today were highly mobile, and in constant contact with their neighbors in trade, and often in war. Even in the “pre-Celtic” period, there is blatant evidence in Ireland at Newgrange of close cultural contact with places as far afield as Brittany, and this was in the Neolithic period almost five thousand years ago. If the people of Ireland were that mobile and interested in “outsiders” that long ago, how much more so has this been the case in more recent centuries or millennia? So, many notions of cultural purity often evaporate rather quickly when any culture is examined more closely. This is certainly true of Rome, but also of Egypt and of Greece, all of which show ample exterior cultural contacts, and cultural interests–and particularly so in terms of their religious practices and the deities involved with them.
home is all there is. Take what you will of it, squabble like rats
Mr Bird was called as a Crown witness, and properly as one; not as a courtesy to the defence a la Douglas Wight. That fact on its own means that, in my view, any perjury on the part of this witness is likely to have a greater bearing on Mr Sheridan’s appeal, should it be allowed to proceed. For the avoidance of doubt, I am not suggesting that it will be more helpful, but simply that the fact the Mr Bird was led by the Crown makes his testimony of greater importance.
And of course,The Hillbilly Goats
1 skein of coordinating color yarn
Personification: Faithfulness For all I know, people’s expectations of me may be that I not stay working at my job, so the mere act of staying with my current job would be unexpected. I will focus on being attentive to what the holy Spirit is calling me to, and acting in whatever way that is in keeping with God’s will for me that I am receiving from the Spirit.
Chong claimed he could hear agents talking in another room, though his screams were never answered. His lawyer claims it was, “at best, inconceivably indifferent negligence”. For their actions, the DEA will review their procedures, and apologized to Chong.
Assumptions that the Great Republic must inevitably spiral into economic and strategic decline - so like the chatter of the late 1980s, when Japan was in vogue - will seem wildly off the mark by then.
-After 7 years of living in this house I finally don’t have fruit on my walls in my kitchen. NO MORE FRUIT! YAY! I have been intimidated by painting my kitchen for 7 years. I hate painting and I don’t trust my skillz in that area. A couple of times I would pull a little piece of wallpaper off and tape it right back up because I wasn’t ready to take on the task. Well I told B the week before last that the following Monday would be the day to rid the kitchen of fruit. Last Monday he went in and ripped a big ole piece of wallpaper off. I almost cried. I took a deep breathe and told myself…YOU can do this! Well my friends I did! It took me a whole week to get it done and now the fruit is gone and my walls are blue and white and it looks magnificent if I do say so myself!
Well, not so much the age, because that doesn't seem to matter so much now that it's not really a landmark year, but for all the great stuff that I think - no, I'm sure - is going to happen over the next year.
Goetz
As for the claim there will be no commercials, the website says only that BEST won’t run “Direct commercial ads that parents can object to and are not good for kids” or air violence or sexually explicit material. That’s not setting the bar very high.
At the start of the 3rd, we’re shirt 2 men. One on his way to a clinic and my son sitting out on the sideline with a bleeding nose.
… as a ghostly reminder of what once was…
Cynthia
A stepping-stone between Sicily and Tunisia, Europe and Africa, Christendom and Islam, Malta has always been coveted for its strategic significance. So many peoples have left their mark there over the millennia that the island is as layered in history as sedimentary rock. Neolithic men built temples on Malta, and the Phoenicians from Tyre left their language. The Romans governed it; St. Paul was shipwrecked on its shore in A.D. 60 and began the conversion of the inhabitants to the new Christian faith. Later came Normans, Angevins, Saracens, Barbary corsairs and the Knights Hospitallers, the intrepid fighting monks of the Order of St. John of Jerusalem. The Knights of St. John were eventually kicked out by Napoleon, whose troops were in turn evicted by the Maltese and the British. Malta finally gained its independence (by civilised – naturally! – agreement with Britain) only in 1964, so in some ways its spirit is as young as it is ancient.
If employees feel neglected, their morale goes down and as a result, customers and shareholders suffer. If customers are neglected; no matter how much you may focus on the employees, the business as a whole suffers paving way for not being able to support those employees at all. If shareholders suffer, it has a ripple effect on the well being of the employees and customers.
As for the nonviolence part, perhaps Mr. Vietor forgot that it was the Brotherhood that assassinated Anwar Sadat, that the Brotherhood was the inspiration for al-Qaeda, and that the genocidal Hamas is the Brotherhood's arm in Gaza. Almost the first thing the new Islamist Parliament did after convening was to vote overwhelmingly to declare Israel it's 'enemy number one', expel Israel's ambassador, and endorse terrorism against Israeli civilians.
40 Second Hand Stand Hold… Followed by:
1. Abed’s Uncontrollable Christmas: I love Abed so much! He and Britta are the characters I see myself in the most and this episode went out of its way to punch me in the heart for both of them. I don’t think it was just me, but the claymation, Christmas, and parents disappointing elements all worked together to tap right into the childhood nostalgia parts of my brain to amazing emotional effect. Gosh, that was bleak. The episode is also hilarious, I swear. There’s singing, clay, and a Christmas Pterodactyl! It’ll break your heart and mend it again in a 20 min episode you’re going to want to watch every Christmas for years to come.
Here’s my card for this week’s My Favorite Things Wednesday Stamp Club sketch challenge. I made yet another teacher thank you card, this time using the a la mode Talk Nerdy to Me set. Even though the sentiments in the set aren’t teacher related, I thought the pencil-gripping gal would be the perfect focal image for a teacher thank you card.
Cut up ham from a previous night
Would rather cut social programs than cut funding to defense contractors. YES
2. The opening line says the kid sister needs to go, but the next paragraph makes it sound like the brother is the one moving "foster siblings etc." So not only is this a gimmick, it's a confusing gimmick. Very not good.
One day I’ll be there
My prayer is that God would use me. That may sound over-simplified, but with all my heart I just want to be obedient to whatever it is He's called me.
When the actress was asked what she puts on before going to bed - she replied: "Only Chanel Number Five."
Per Montreal MMA News:
Staring from within some other body
brujeria Garage of Cinemateca Boliviana - La Paz Bolivia 2011/06/08
The FF#95 Shoe of the Week goes to:
It is an interesting variation on the drummer theme. Again, at first, contrast seems to prevail over similarity. Whereas Rev. King referred to the problematic role of the showy and perhaps self-promoting drum major in a parade, Heine chose to speak of the humble drummer in an actual military unit. And yet they are, certainly in this context, closely related. Both are, de facto, the visible and audible embodiment of the cause. Both, by marching at the head of the troops, become natural targets for the enemy.
2. Sautee sausage meat, cooking until brown and breaking up the pieces with a wooden spoon. Add turkey and onions and cook until browned, breaking up the pieces as it cooks all the way through. Season the mix with salt and pepper. Add in the mushrooms and 8oz tomato sauce. Simmer on low and cover for about 20 minutes.
I would think I'm preaching to the converted in writing about Borough's, The Rake so I'll keep it brief. It's one of those placesthat has been on the list for some time, is by no means a trek from work, yet I'd never been. We won't count the weekend when i found it closed and all I could do was stare through the window and vow to return.
Of the seven members in the committee, four, including Virupakshappa, are from BJP, two from Congress and one from JD(S). The Congress and JD(S) said there’s no need for a probe and the three tainted former ministers — Krishna Palemar, Laxman Savadi and C C Patil — should be disqualified.
B= Boy. Your project must be for a boy.
Or checking out?
or gods no longer relevant
We made 'Black Bottom Banana Cones' today!
Millington – Federal prison camp next door to Memphis Naval Air Station.
The makeover list included:
Keywords are the words and phrases people use when they are searching for something online. Last night, for example, I wanted to make something interesting with the ground lamb I already had in the fridge. My husband remembered a recipe where ground beef was shaped around skewers, so I entered “ground lamb on skewers recipe” into Google and found several options. I ended up making Ground Lamb with Moroccan Spices on a Stick, which I found at http://shecookshecleans.net/2011/08/20/kefta-kabobs/ Kefta Kabobs. Delicious!
In accessing these possibilities, Grabowsky says that a festival needs to be the result of a meaningful process that includes the local arts community, and which results in the public experiencing the kind of work that they haven't seen before. "Why else would governments spend so much money on them?" he asks rhetorically. "What else are they for?"
-You are also the happiest child i have ever met
Indeed, this is a real test for my nerves, especially after a tiring day at work. I am going through elementary school again and I have the same feelings as I used to when I was the student. What I am saying is that, after I finished school I kind of liked the winter and all that comes along. Now, when summer is over, I have a deep depression and feel like I have to go to school again.
Given Ms. Cutter’s regurgitation of the anti-”Big Oil” mantra, let me explain the “special tax break” afforded by Congress to oil companies. Progressives ad nauseum tout “renewable” energy, ala solar and wind as suitable substitutes for “finite” sources, ala oil and coal. A manufacturer gets to to “depreciate” assets like machines and equipment which wear out and become obsolete, that so that they have the money to replace, when repairs and maintenance (also tax-deductible) cease to be feasible.
Dead. Lines. Gone are the days writing at a leisurely pace, taking off days, even weeks, before feeling the need to sit and write a couple of more pages before the next vacation. Now it is a matter of discipline. I write everyday unless there is an emergency that requires my attention. I have a daily word count goal of 2500 words that I can usually manage in two or three hours. On a bad day it might take me four. But this change, the discipline of it, is not all a bad thing.
We eventually arrived home and found members of the ‘God Squad’ at the door, well at least two of them, and hey, not American! They come later on in the year…
And a little of that.
“How many of you are feeling uncomfortable right now?” Heidi Hayes Jacobs asked at her EdJEWcon conference keynote yesterday. I confess. I didn’t raise my hand. When Heidi Hayes Jacobs emphatically shared that we should feel uncomfortable, I wondered, feeling a bit like the child in class who has just gotten the “wrong” answer. Now please don’t misunderstand, I was riveted by Heidi Hayes Jacobs’ presentation. My mind raced with her notion of “strategic upgrade”; not adding to our already overfull plates but shifting learning experiences strategically to more effectively meet the needs of our students today who are processing information differently, in more social, non-linear ways. I was feeling engaged, open, reflective, and interested. I was considering possibilities , reflecting on how better we might serve our students. I was learning and I was loving the opportunity.
Scoop dough using a cookie scoop and set on ungreased cookie sheets. Flatten the top slightly.
I am the Advocacy Coordinator at St. Anthony Foundation. Once, after introducing myself as St. Anthony's Advocacy Coordinator, I asked a group of high school aged volunteers if any of them knew what advocacy was. One young man raised his hand and said, "isn't that when you, like, don't have sex, or something?" I don't know if he was thinking of "abstinence" or "celibacy" - he surely wasn't thinking about advocacy.
They point out that some older people turn to drink as a way of coping with changes in life like retirement and bereavement, or feelings of boredom, loneliness and depression. No doubt this is true, but the same can happen at any stage of life, and the vast majority of pensioners don’t seem to succumb. In my experience, most older people settle down to a regular routine of moderate drinking and rarely if ever overdo it. They have learned the difference between “just enough” and “too much”.
Rather than choosing colours randomly from the colour wheel, some logical reasons would make this exercise more robust.
Flower bronzed all fabrics boasts a deep take dye, full-bodied and other extended time strength.
What do we need for this special day?
Twenty-two main characters populate the L.A. of Altman's screenplay, co-written with Frank Barhydt. Unlike the movers and shakers of Hollywood depicted in The Player, Altman zeroes in on the people who surround Hollywood's elite in the suburbs — working- and middle-class citizens struggling with marriages and jobs, natural disasters and human tragedies. Singling out some cast members above others in this top-notch ensemble seems unfair, but the standouts in my mind are Jack Lemmon, Tim Robbins and Jennifer Jason Leigh.
The redevelopment plans for the site include a museum micro-brewery so after a rather dramatic downsizing brewing in Wandsworth could be on the up.
On my walk to work
This is Jantz & I @ the shooting range :)
In a nutshell, I was hired, by an English journal, to cover all the fashion events here in Quebec City. The first paragraph explains the rest. A few details, a rue- is a street (rue Saint Joseph is in the lower city of Quebec. The city has been working to restore it.
I'm not a "long-haired person" anymore
She formed a mom’s group unlike any other I’ve been to.
Supreme Court: Winner
...love that song! I grew up with it, you?
God is calling
Jackie: Epic-melodic-guitar/cello/drum-doom-chunk yumminess!
The rancidness
Now I've got That Critical Voice in the back of my head talking to me constantly as I'm trying to work on it. It says, not good enough, not good enough, not good enough, on repeat. And no matter how rational I try to be, or patient, or just sometimes plain ignoring it, the voice seems to rise up louder and louder and louder.
5. Anyone can vote. For a vote to be eligible the voter must “Like” the photo in the competition album.
3. Some of the emerging hybrid forms of church government I find quite attractive. If you are interested ask me for details.
The grounds of the inn have fabulous views of the White Mountains. From the long deck behind the hotel are sweeping views of green lawns and large mature trees, behind that, the whole of the White Mountains march across the horizon, the Presidential range including Washington are visible on the left and Lafayette and Cannon are directly ahead. Painting those big mountains is a lot of fun and they make great paintings, at least when you win. If you look at the picture of the inn, above, you can get some idea of those mountains and the old inn itself.
I didn't want to use the pillows that I actually use to sleep on, so I opted for one of my neck pillows that I take on the plane. Those things get wily!
Cleveland Indians - Baseball Dad (PAID)
Massachusetts – The Square Root of Murder by Ada Madison
Stamps: Impression Obsession
If you want to make a difference in someone's life then have children.
When the Labour Party was in power, the Home Office website had a section devoted to hate crime, in which it stated the typical hate crime offender was white, young and working class. This was a lie, but a necessary lie in accord with Labours’ now admitted policy of transforming the traditional, racial and cultural Britain they so hated.
The next two are Maputo, Mozambique.
I just wanted to tell you I counted all your clean socks.. You have 34 pairs of white socks and 13 black ones, half of those are new and have been worn once or twice, so why are you wearing mine right now? Why do you ever wear mine? I have 10 pair,s now it will be 9 since I can never wear them after you, since they get all stretched out. I love you very much..just put my socks slowly down and back away!!!! :)
Twisty tree,
came from being so cold. It was in the 40's here last week and I was freezing! We are out of wood fior the woodstove and I hate to use fue oil with ther cost so high, so we suffered through. When I get cold my muscles in the neck and shoulders are the first ones to get tight. After several days, the pain began.
Clubs
Hey everyone.
Here’s a postulate for 2011: Freeing self and others from a low-scale, imprisoning moral to a high-scale, liberating ethic. LRH, from the Philadelphia Doctorate Course lecture Chart of Attitudes: Rising Scale Processing, 11 December 1952:
My expenses were pretty much on par in April. I only went over in one category (Car Maintenance and Repair) which I plan to make up for in May no problem. I know, one paragraph ago I said I was prepared, but considering I had an $800 expense and I’m only over $40 in this category, I think I’m doing ok!
We had a challenge over on TAC's Paper Crafting community of doing One Layer only (not counting embellishements). Sometimes I find it easy and other times, not. There are so many great cards done that I had to work pretty hard to come up with something different, to my way of thinking...
The Man From London (Fred Kelemen)
“It’s like these guys no one had ever heard of became the most successful multimillionaires overnight,” said one person with knowledge of the investigation. “It’s Hezbollah’s money.”
But look what she has.
Place the 1 1/2 cups cream in a large bowl and beat until stiff peaks form. Mix in 1/3 of the pumpkin mixture with a spatula to lighten the mixture. Add the remaining pumpkin mixture to the cream mixture and gently fold in until combined.
For Bookings hit us at pharaohsden@gmail.com. Thanks for the support. Bless.
We are also going to finish the Food Network magazine challenge I had started last summer where we were going to make every recipes in the June/July issue but which got interrupted by 2 different surgeries. The kids are not at all averse to this challenge as most of the remaining recipes are the dessert ones. We’ll be making the recipes, taking photos of them and then giving our opinions on whether they were a success or not.
This ‘scyaunce’ of heraldry had it’s own language and code called Blazon, a unique language which governed strictly how the symbols should be placed and displayed on the shield. However it was and still is the art that is the point of contact for most people. Without the pictorial display the ancient, obscure and academic language of heraldry would be lost on most people and that is why the art of heraldry is more important than some heraldic academics would care to admit.
I had fun making this card! I used the stamp set FALL FOR YOU from Unity/Ippity that I won from the Ippity Chick Challenge#14. You can see the randomly chosen winning card on my January 25th post and it's also the card that I sent to my mom so she could give it to her friend!!!
Why does Jesus warn those whom he had healed not to tell who he was? How does Isaiah’s prophesy shed light on the type of Messiah Jesus was to be? Would he come in violence or in peace?
i painted this built-in and the fireplace mantle a creamy off-white, then heavily distressed it with glaze and antique lines. then, i topped it all off with a nice decorative design that i hand-painted in the center of the mantle!
(4) A small photo printer capable of printing 5x7s
TEEN CHOICE 2012 is executive-produced by Bob Bain (“Nickelodeon Kids’ Choice Awards”) and Michael Burg. Paul Flattery and Kelly Brock serve as producers and Greg Sills serves as supervising producer.
Surgery number 4 this Thursday.. Funny though because one month ago the doctors deemed her condition just inoperable. No more opening her up. No more biopsies.. "ALL we can do is wait on this virus". 4 weeks later- the doctors are baffled by what they are seeing on her MRI. "We have to open her up and see what is going on"... For the first time, we got the news back of surgery and Marissa and I were elated.
Analysis: Like the Colts the Skins have nowhere else to go (they didn’t give up all those pick to grab Matt Kalil, no matter how good you think he is.) One way or the other Washington is getting a franchise QB
Before the thorns taught me their sharp lessons and bled weakness from me I had but one brother, and I loved him well. But those days are gone and what is left of them lies in my mother's tomb. Now I have many brothers, quick with knife and sword, and as evil as you please. We ride this broken empire and loot its corpse. They say these are violent times, the end of days when the dead roam and monsters haunt the night. All that's true enough, but there's something worse out there, in the dark. Much worse.
A glimpse of Sime Darby’s cost overruns in its energy and utilities division:
Christmas day was so exciting for McGuire, Santa found our house after all them moving we had just done. We were so excited! McGuire had no idea that there were gifts under our tree, he just wanted his lights on. When we pointed out that there were some surprises there for him he was so thrilled! We let him open up the biggest one first (big mistake) it was a potty! He wanted to go potty they rest of the morning and open his presents that way. Lol my mom got a picture of us with him on it. He wouldn't get up from it. But all in all he had a great Christmas!
A. As I read it, the implied argument/conclusion is:
Many of my blog friends love animals as much as I do. Seriously love. My house would be an empty shell without the love and affection I have been blessed with. My pets are as much a part of my family as my child and my husband!
I actually started a post on Good Friday, which turned into me continuing it on Saturday - and thats as far as it got. I think I need to get my blogging mojo back - I think I'll file a 'missing mojo' report at the local police station cos i've not seen it for a long time.
Also I can't help thinking about what was done to her to make this little girl think that is the best reaction when she doesn't get her way. It hurts more that someone did this to her, to make her react with such anger and violence. To use her little fists to get her way.
This train, all aboard
After a bit of introductory text, the reader is then invited to click through 13 slides with an image from each state and the percentage of people who live there who have a college degree, presumably of the four-year variety. (To save you time, I will tell you that Arkansas came in first, or last, depending on how you look at it.)
The fansubs are not perfect either, but who am I to complain about that? I feel very fortunate to be able to watch something like this and not be 100% lost. But really, if you find this without subtitles, you will have almost no trouble following what is going on. It personally drives me nuts to not know, but that's just me.
and the art in the dining area is so richly saturated.. love..
Pour the root beer and molasses into a deep medium-sized pot, and bring the mixture to a boil over high heat. (You need those high sides because the baking soda will froth up very high, and you don't want it to spill over! So make sure there's some meaningful space between the liquid and the top of the pot.)
The photo to the left is of the writer's building, fairly new, and accommodating up to fourteen writers. The Gihon River runs through Johnson and was frozen over in most places. Aye, we had some sun, and for those liverbelly landlubbers who find themselves chilled to the bone from just settin' eyes on these pics, well, toss yer eyes on the ones below from the Vermont Studio Center website:
On a Sunday at the end of July (more anon) Radio 4 will be presenting a new 4-part series called Poetry Workshop. Hosted by Ruth Padel, each session will be offered from a different part of the country.
An intriguing read that I'd recommend for Middle Grade/Young Adult readers of paranormal romance.
Oil slicks from the BP spill have already reached the Gulf wetlands and beaches, killing thousands of birds, fish, marine mammals, and oyster beds, as well as plant life. Still, BP continues to deny the existence of oil plumes. Plumes are huge curtains of oil that remain deep in the ocean and may note even be detectable from its surface. For example, just one plume has been measured at 3 miles across and 1,500 feet thick, at a depth of 3,600 feet below the surface of the ocean.[5] Plumes like these have the potential to kill hundreds of dolphins and whales, and millions of fish and other marine organisms. If this situation continues for another month or two, huge sections of the Gulf of Mexico could well become a dead zone.[6] This could bring dire consequences for the ecology, the fishing industry, and tourism, not only in the U.S. states that border on the Gulf, but also in portions of the Caribbean.
By mid nineteenth century Lemington Point was the finishing line for skiff races starting at either the Tyne or Scotswood Bridges. The famous oarsman, Harry Clasper, frequently entered these races.
I got married to my boyfriend because I was pregnant. A lot of people did not approve of our decision but we still went ahead with it. It had been rocky from the start as we were driven individuals, just starting to have a career. Being young, everything was all over the place. The arguments, the decision making, the learning to stand on our own thing only to learn we cannot do it by ourselves. Ultimately, we had to separate and that was the hardest part.
As is The Bullshit's chip-pissing way, though, the day after I published that post saw the chemo-evils begin to kick in. Not, I ought to make clear, to the kind of nasty levels as my chemo for breast cancer (for one thing, I’ve got my hair and I’m ruddy well keeping it), but still pretty fucking shitty nonetheless. First there’s Chemo Wednesday itself: an emotionally fraught and annoyingly long but otherwise manageable day. The following 24 hours is when the drugs start doing their thing, which generally translates into hit-by-a-plank tiredness and a sickness that, mercifully, we’ve been keeping under control with a kitchen-sink approach to anti-emetics. Rubbing
According to Yahoo, Lucca, a city in the heart of Tuscany, has passed a city-wide measure that bans "ethnic" eateries within city limits. Apparently feeling threatened by kebab and curries, the center right city council's action was applauded by Italy's agricultural minister, who is, of course, a member of Italy's Lega Nord, which is known for its xenephobic leaning.
That said, judges in Canada are amongst the most well-informed and articulate participants in our system of governance. Would Canadian society as a whole, taking into account the justice system, benefit from more outspoken “out of court” discourse by the judiciary? Does the retirement of a judge make a difference in this discussion?
But it's perfect for giving those F-111's a place to lay their wings back and thunder across the terrain at near twice the speed of sound and maybe two hundred or so feet above the ground.
Lunch went fine. Sandee was starting to open up a bit about her life.
Life is the bubbles
I had this post planned out. I was very excited to tell you how much better I've been feeling with this pregnancy than the last. Then last night, around 2 am, I threw up. That may be too much info for some of you, but there's just no other way to say it. Now, I'm much further along than I was when the sickness hit with Jude, so I'm still clinging to the idea that I'm not going to fall into the vicious "eat, throw up, eat throw up, cry, cry, cry" cycle of last time. Up until last night, I'd just been having very mild and occasional nausea. I'm trying to believe that last night was just a fluke and we will now return to how incredible I've been feeling. At the very least I'm thankful for an extra two and a half weeks of keeping down food.
Then why did she send the cartoon to the media in the first place? "Because I'm an idiot," Norris replied.
We can not come to this place of worship because our parents were Christians or because we always attended church. It’s not like in Egypt where your birth certificate indicates whether you are “C” for Christian – because you cannot be a Christian until you make the decision to follow Christ yourself. It is not something that you are born into. As a side note, the Muslim world doesn’t get this because Islam is so tied into their politics. When you are sharing your faith with someone who has an Islamic faith, share this point with them – its worth the clarification.
I hope not, baby.
You were warned several months ago that I am not the world’s best Cajun dancer.
It also helped me understand too, why it was Franklyn that took to the task of teaching me about unconditional love and non-judgement when I had the very likes of Jesus already in my meditations teaching me about how the body works energetically. I could never figure out why the very person who exemplifies love and non-judgement (Jesus) wouldn’t have been the one to hold my hand (and many melt downs) thru my own process of becoming….
With eyes so wide
While we’re laughing, laughing
(WARNING: DO NOT READ IF YOU ARE SENSITIVE TO BAD LANGUAGE.)
But bar staffing doesn’t seem to be among their strong points. This isn’t xenophobia (although it’s nice to be able to use a word that begins with an ‘x’ that’s actually pronounced as a ‘z’). It’s just a fact based on admittedly very, very limited experience. Unless, of course, they were actually acting in a Hungarian sit-com based in London, in which case they were very, very impressive.
While I'm here...just another quick update on my crochet blankie. It really is coming along swimmingly right now...
i just couldn't help tuning my ipod to my favorite summer music.
Tear..do not cut, pieces of newspaper into strips. Dip a strip into the glue mixture, use your fingers to remove excess glue, then wrap the strip around the bird. Continue this until your bird and its tail are covered. Now is the hardest part.
Lovely nose of aromatic red and black fruit with a touch of oak spice, quite fresh and subtly lifted aromas.
Father I pray these truths become as real to us as the air we breath the things we see and smell and taste and hear and that we touch. Give us spiritual discernment that we confess you as Lord and lean upon your promises and rest in the assurance that you love us with a perfect love. Manifest that love in us today that we may walk in the Spirit all day. In Jesus Name.
1 fruitless
With everlasting ebb and flow obeys,
Women.
“The dream stage of sleep, based on its unique neurochemical composition, provides us with a form of overnight therapy, a soothing balm that removes the sharp edges from the prior day’s emotional experiences.”
Now remember we are only talking about going on a vegan diet program for health reasons, but as listed before there are more very good reasons to think about a Meal Delivery Plans. And if you do pursue a vegan diet if you feel it is your best choice to a healthy eating plan, we laud you in your efforts.
This is among the best-known of Shakespeare’s plays and is his shortest tragedy, believed to have been written between 1603 and 1606. It is frequently performed at both amateur and professional levels and has been adapted for opera, film, books, stage and screen. Often regarded as archetypal, the play tells of the dangers of the lust for power and the betrayal of friends. For the plot Shakespeare drew loosely on the historical account of “King Macbeth of Scotland” by Raphael Holinshed and that by the Scottish philosopher Hector Boece. There are many superstitions centered on the belief the play is somehow “cursed” and many actors will not mention the name of the play aloud, referring to it instead as “The Scottish Play.”
Maybe later, I'll address my desire for creativity and learning to sew.
Records — Rye 5-0; Byram Hills 5-1.
One of my next lustful favorites for Valentine's Day are the homemade marshmallows from Baked NYC. At only $4.50 for delicious, soft, clouds of vanilla, chocolate or peppermint! You can also choose a marshmallow set if you cannot decide! Think of all the possibilities with these beauties... add them to hot chocolate, make s'mores, toast them over the hibachi, share them with your Valentine, or don't share them at all!!
Next spring . Did you know how much I love spring?! I spotted this scene yesterday and had to capture it to share here.......
In the past few months, I’ve been amazed again at the generosity of others, including many of you, who have stepped in and helped my wife and I as we walk through my wife’s journey with cancer.
6. A Bipolar Copyright System for the Digital Network Environment: Alexander Peukert7. Sharing Out Online Liability: Sharing Files, Sharing Risks and Targeting ISPs: Bob Clark
Next thing is as you all know we held a Design Team call and we would like to say Thank you to each and everyone of you who entered. With that said we would like to take the time and Welcome.......
Shoes are awesome, shoes are hot. Some make me feel comfortable, some make me feel like I can take on the world. Some say, “I mean business,” while others say, “Clothes? Who needs em? You just need us and a big ol smile, now get over here big boy.”
Here’s the thing though, despite this notable flaw Parenthood is actually pretty good. As you can see above there are a lot of talented people at work here. Krause, Lorelai, and even Dax Shepard are all enjoyable actors and there are a couple of moments in the pilot where their talent carries along the script that is desperate to bring us back into the world of cliché. The pilot even had one of those scenes Brothers & Sisters can’t get enough of where all of the brothers and sisters end up in the same room and they end up spilling each other’s secrets much to the bemusement of the other siblings so that they all get a chance to comment on each other’s life.
“Don’t easily believe to those boys, Baekkie.” Xiu Min stop his activity for a moment, looking at Baekhyun in a serious look. “They are… Tricky.”
I want you all to know that I truly do value any and all friends that I have. And if you only knew the struggle that came my way -after I hit publish, yesterday. Wowzers! I really honestly thought I would have to sing this song for the rest of the day. My entire life, maybe?
Next was the 차돌박이 pronounced cha-dol-bak-i (KRW 15,000 for 120g). Chadol is thinly sliced beef brisket and like all beef in Korea is usually expensive. Here it was priced cheap so weren’t expecting a premium cut of beef and what we got was more like roast beef. It wasn’t bad but don’t bother ordering it here, just stick to the samgyeopsal.
Maybe it’s all social and political satire, conceived for amusement and a film/book/video game?
When one of the above probes finds a soft point where resistance is weak, then pressure is stepped up, and the “spontaneous” violence of the Muslim street may appear to help the infidels make the right decisions. If the probe continues to bear fruit, the situation may escalate to carefully modulated riots, arson, vandalism, and assaults. When the kuffar authorities finally yield — and allow the construction of a mosque, or fund a Muslim community center, or permit the burqa on public transport — then the entire playbook that generated the successful probe is replicated and used on another front.
These people live in a bubble.It's gotten to the point where they're making their own reality.
Our 147 Uganda Beads are also going like crazy. I do also have some really cute re-usable totes on their now, too. I just rain out of beads because a super wonderful lady bought everything I had left last night! You can see pictures of them on my FB page, too.
As I read the book I was in awe of how much I really liked the story. The characters were hard edged, complicated and multidimensional. The plot as well had many quirks that made you smile and fantastic twists that you could see happening but you get so wrapped up into the story you only concentrated on the subject at hand.
Other Bad Ben Nanobrewery News:
In the last week I had two different friends tell me stories about the death of a close family member and the extraordinary experience they had with the body afterwards. In both cases the body was handled in a way that’s unusual by American standards, yet both women told me (with deep conviction) that it made all the difference in helping them cope with the loss.
I think I’ll just get out and walk
But I've since done some computer editing/fun framing and have come up with:
Has google become a doctor? Yet it actually convinces you that you have whatever their talking about!
Acknowledging his subjectivity on the subject or not, it is clear that Nietzsche does not see woman as being naturally inclined towards intellectual matters, because he identifies such matters as fundamental about a want to seek truth, which is barred to women because to face the truth of their deceitful character is too shameful—and ultimately harmful—to their person: “Among women: ‘Truth? Oh, you don’t know truth! Is it not an attempt to kill our modesty?’”[22] This defensiveness, according to Nietzsche, serves simply as a crafty cover to distract lurkers and probers from inquiring too deeply into the shallowness at the core of the female psych:
Wire - Chairs Missing - 1978
As previously mentioned, the tone of this film is darker, it’s a quest for the truth by Peter Parker, the truth behind his parents death.
I hit “Reply” and told the librarian so.
So, back to the book promos as I have taken some time away from that, too. But, for those paying attention, the press release just went out today so now the fine citizens of NYC and LA, be warned. Mike Feldman is about to invade your lives, too! Here I come! Annie, get your gun! Yee-haw!
But when you’re watching on TV you can sit back and enjoy the carnage with the knowledge that you can sleep at night.
TONY BLAIR warned the high command of Rupert Murdoch’s media empire last night that the Thatcherite free-market policies they espoused in the 1980s had failed to provide the social and economic stability needed to manage the technological revolution they unleashed.
When we were led on the journey of adoption we knew that it would be a trans-formative journey. An exciting Indiana Jones adventure that leads you into uncharted territory, where you will be tested and tried, and come out on the other side with some kind of priceless historical artifact...or, maybe just some bumps and bruises.
Release Date: 1st March 2012
For the gradient I used the technique of layering all the colors on a cosmetic sponge and then sponging them on all at once. I'm so in love with this technique that now I look for any excuse to do a gradient. I stamped using Wet 'n Wild Black Creme and Bundle Monster plate BM-223. I then matted the whole thing using Essie Matte About You. The matte topcoat smudged the stamped pattern a bit, so in hindsight I probably should have used a regular top coat first and then the matte.The good news is that the smudges are only visible up close :)
Be trusting. Place your confidence in the people you work with, and demonstrate that trust to them. Listen carefully to the thoughts and feelings that they express to you, without interrupting while they’re talking. Involve people in the decisions that affect them by: identifying who is responsible for each decision, working together to approve decisions, consult the people who will be directly affected by each decision, and informing the rest of the people on your team. Give other people the freedom to make the decisions they’re responsible for rather than trying to control them, and try not to override a decision that has already been made.
Potential Insights: This will deliver more insights around the relationships from participants and how the preparation has positively or negatively affect these relationships.
At the top of the picture is a heart shaped Pink Popcorn Ball with Pink & White M&M's (tastes like a Rice Crispies treat), for her snack time. Then you can see that card I made her with some bling on it because she loves anything that sparkles, and I don't want glitter all over everything. For her lunch, I made her heart shaped sandwiches using some homemade Pomegranate Jelly with heart shaped Fruit Rollups on top, next to some White Cheddar puffs. At the bottom is some Vanilla Yogurt with some Strawberries and Sprinkles, also for snack time. I mean why not go all out, here? :)
Hence the winding side-roads.
Dale had always worn the pants in his household. It wasn’t anything either of them considered old-fashioned or misogynistic; it’s just the way it had always been. Major decisions were always deferred to him — the choice of Tennessee for their homestead; that they just weren’t the type of people who could properly raise children; the selection of Methodism for their occasional soul cleansing; and their post-retirement relocation to Florida. These were all things Dale had decided for the both of them, his wife offering up little more than a lukewarm but earnest affirmation that whatever choice he had made was the right one.
Chandan and Ninad started laughing loudly…
10. Singin' The Blues
I love bracelets – you can see them and enjoy them while you’re wearing them!
It wouldn't be a blog update without pictures, so here is an oldie but a goody. This was my backyard and garage 5 days after the levee broke. Most people call it hurricane Katrina. To me, it's "how to live in your van, step one."
Nancy Allen may seem to have the thankless role of sidekick, but her portrayal of Lewis serves more of a function than we may at first realize. She at several points helps Murphy/RoboCop remember who he used to be, let alone what he swore to uphold. Far removed from roles in The Last Detail, Carrie, I Wanna Hold Your Hand and 1941, Allen does herself proud as a very empowered woman.
Admittedly, I was as pumped up as anyone about it for a couple distinct reasons: A) it's not a chain and B) its ownership, Bread & Butter Concepts, is responsible for two other respectable places in town, BRGR and Urban Table, both in the PV/Corinth area.
"Better. Maybe not all the way."
Easy Sweet Potato Veggie Burgers with Avocado,
and what the hell, tap my damn phones,
As an aside, Baka to Test to Shoukanjuu was the first series that I know of to use Ben-Day dots as an overall style. I’d be curious to see if their usage was similar to Acchi Kocchi, or directing the audience in a different manner.
Has enough brains for codes
I'm officially completely against the ropes in terms in of both work and class submissions and have been pulling 16 hour days since Sunday. Let me tell you, it is no bueno and I don't like it one bit. But, unfortunately there is no end in sight until Friday... that's just how the cookie crumbles sometimes.
In a large skillet, melt butter or bacon grease. Saute mushrooms and onions until well cooked. Add garlic and cook for a minute longer. Pour in cream and cook on medium high, stirring constantly until cream thickens. Thaw out spinach and squeeze excess water. Add to the creamed mushrooms. Salt and pepper and keep cooking spinach. Add shrimp and cook until shrimp turns pink. Grate some parmesan cheese in the dish.Taste seasoning and adjust. Sprinkle cooked bacon on top.
Also read-up on "who’s" really behind the destruction of everything we hold dear and it should point you directly to the "so-called" chosen people of God who falsely claimed that, that Desert sandpit called the State of Israel belongs to them.
Submission deadline for abstracts: 10 June 2012
I am determined to clear it all out, I am over the whole clutter scenario.
"It wasn't until now that I was lucky enough to be pregnant with a child I had no means to support."
As I wrote last week, my prayer life has been sporadic. This verse reminds me to be alert and persistent in my prayer life, not just for myself but for others as well. It reminds me to pray at ALL times and on EVERY occasion. Not just when I need something. Not just when it gets hard. But to pray daily. Pray about what I need, what I long for for my children. Praying for my husband. Praying for family and friends. Praying for my government. Praying for God's kingdom and will.
A spokesperson for Icasa was not immediately available to comment.
Last night, as I approached the pivotal moment of deciding whether to change into PJ's or gym clothes - I chose gym clothes. As I told Kyle - I may very well fall asleep in my gym clothes, but I'm not going to the gym in my PJs. I put on my shoes, and went to help put the girls to bed. We came downstairs and I stood at the door to my house. I looked outside at the cold, rainy weather. And I looked at the warm inviting couch. I looked at my tennis shoes on my feet and I looked at my keys hanging on the wall. Then I sat down and fell asleep on the couch.
Sometimes, I plan poetry posts well in advance. This isn’t one of those.
I swapped out any odd hangers. I like only white plastic hangers in the closet. Looks less messy. Simple, but effective way to make it look a little better.
Mr. McGuire: Plastics.
JC and Eve stayed for a couple of weeks. Chatted to just about everyone.
Heirloom Seasons - Beautiful handmade, heirloom quality gifts. Renee loves to create with vintage materials and feel a connection to the past; to create with natural materials and feel a connection to the earth. She loves to create for her children and is inspired by the seasons of the year.
It seems probable that the Green Party votes will overwhelmingly support Livingstone as second preference as will those voting for Siobhan Benita while the UKIP and BNP voters will probably (though not certainly) give a second preference to Boris Johnson.
So I'm writing this to everyone who goes in pubs, who loves them, and feels relaxed in them enough to chill out and forget you're in public: don't be the person who makes it easier for thieving bastards than everyone else does. Just keep your stuff with you, and out of sight. It sounds boring. It sounds nannyish. It makes you think of things you'd rather not think of while you're enjoying yourself. But it's absolutely necessary.
However, we should no forget that the “R” word is a multi-purpose tool and its uses are not just defensive, it is at its most effective when it is used as an offensive weapon with which to bludgeon opponents or as a smear in order to damage the reputation of those who refuse to dance the diversity foxtrot.
no, worst of all is i know i set the tone and i'm sucking that up really bad right now. i have a big work project deadline, very little internet so far which has really killed my productivity for that, and just lots of stress as we started out. but the more i focus on just being calm and fun, the more they just do stupid things that drive me crazy. and dad is great, he's been taking them all over so i can work in peace. but as soon as they get home, it's just back to the fighting and mean and acting stupid.
R1- ch2, 6sc in 2nd ch from hook, do not join (6)
The quintessential neighbourhood park… Hilal Park is tucked away amidst the shady streets and stylish homes of Phase VI, one Karachi’s most affluent residential areas. Not particularly large, it is spread over a modest 4.54 acres; but what it lacks in space, it makes up for in serenity and creative landscaping. It is the quintessential neighbourhood park – safe and secure and where you will see many familiar faces.
Lunch: Apple Chicken (but may pick up a salad somewhere as that sounds better)
Timor mortis conturbat me.
Similar to a movie preview, a book trailer is a 30-second to 3-minute video teaser for a book. It’s designed to generate buzz and interest. It can also be used to promote your work to agents and publishers.
Currently, there is that narrow margin of time, which will only last a couple of weeks at the best, enabling me to watch the sun as it meets the horizon, while I am on my way home.
It showed no mercy and never picked favorites.
People who were booked on those buses have now made private travel arrangements and will still be attending the March.
Early, pretty much everywhere I go. I really really dislike being late.
PUTAR: In other words the government is a divided house, papaji?
While Anandan hailed from Tamil Nadu, Sayem was from Uttar Pradesh, he said, adding the bodies would be sent to the respective states for cremation.
In the midst of cloudy illusions,
And I’m no writer.
Every weekday for the last 3 weeks I have been in a constant cleaning rotation.
3. (4) Mirai Nikki (episodes 24-26) – Considering I spoiled myself by reading the rest of the manga, I probably wasn’t as excited as I should’ve been. But these last few episodes were really great. I’m so happy they didn’t include the cheesy ending!
Why didn’t he swallow his pride, find the right words to say?
bzzzzzzzzzzz
There's almost a fortnight to enter our challenge and maybe YOU will be picked at random to win YOUR choice of 4 Sugar Nellie stamps...but you got to be in it to win it :)
Suggestions: They have a very good core of ROLE players. And role players’ effectivity would be best maximize if they play their uhm, roles. Unfortunately for the ½ of the Lina franchise, their role players were not playing their roles.
Yeah, that’s me. The guy in the long gray pimp coat hanging onto a pole in the U1 to Reumannplatz. The one with Southern rock –Georgia’s finest—blasting out of his pink iPod and spilling out all over a subway car full of down-gazing gray Viennese, Muslim moms with shopping bags that say Strawberry Shortcake, and maybe even some folks from the other Georgia. That’s me in the middle of that.
Break Like the Wind
For so long our goal has been to make it. To make a house full of love, foundations strong, lessons we learned not needing history to repeat itself. We took the hard way sometimes and we took our way. We held on, and now we are having to let go. The difficult dance of when to do what, and where is HARD to know.
So I worked. I read. I learned. I tried. I spent every waking moment trying to make this place better…for you guys AND for me.
* Re: The submission letter. If you've been published in a different area should it be mentioned? Should you include writing qualifications?
I started to make the long swim in with the rest of the set breaking on me, but it wasn’t too bad. This is where a pair of reef booties comes in handy, because the reef is sharp with urchins hidden in the cracks. Urchin fest.
Here is some more information about this book you might find helpful.
If you've ever wondered what the rest of it says:
It is Princess Lolly’s 89th birthday party and a glorious jelly is on the menu. However there is a problem: the jelly refuses to wobble!
The story ends with a small ray of hope, Amir and Sohrab fly a kite together for the first time, and as Amir cuts down another Kite, Sohrab smiles for a moment.
Remember that you need to be continuously purging your follower list every so often (once a week is fine), and I can tell you how to do that manually, here. Or you can go the easier route and pay for a service that will mostly automate the following and purging for you, and you can find info on that here.
Mui Ne is a popular beach town on the southeastern coast of Vietnam that is famous for the red and white sand dunes just out of town. The fishing harbour supplies the town and resort restaurants with fresh fish and seafood. Please note that the woven round basket is a traditional boat as well.
It's Saturday morning and we woke up to the sun shining. We opened all the blinds in the RV and the sky is blue and it's gorgeous outside. We're gonna go for a long walk later. Erik fixed all the leaky problems yesterday and we can finally relax.
ox Kay
13. Jamaica 69
Sir James proceeds steadily to Balfour House, pausing to look around as he enters the grounds. What a fine estate he will have, he reflects, when these grounds are combined with his own.
12. Marissa
Bitter gourd (scientific name, Momordica charantia, Chinese: 苦瓜, Japanese, Goya) is an edible bitter vegetable. It is well know for its’ medicinal value such as stimulating digestion, increase insulin sensitivity, might be an effective treatment for HIV and some species have anti Malaria properties.
Damascus
Even so, in the days before the digital revolution turned everything upside down, there wasn't much incentive for authors to revert their rights once their books went out of print. Rights to an already-published book were extremely difficult to re-sell; and with none of the easy self-publishing options that exist today, there wasn't much an author could do with them on their own.
Well, change often requires such tradeoffs; the question is how wise they are.
After musical practice, I made dinner for Chunnie and myself. It’s the second time I’ve ever made food, I hope it taste a lot better than before.
This week I walked into my Weight Watchers meeting angry. My arm is *still* in pain, though less and less every day. I went to the doctors yesterday, again. This time they said “Hey, let’s do that X-Ray we keep saying we don’t need… just to be safe.” Turns out… yeah, it was broken. So, for a month I’ve been walking around, working, using, my arm broken. Mind you – it’s a minor fracture. Argh.
Keep checking back for my first give away, coming soon. Friend me now on my blog or tpt at www.teacherspayteachers.com/Product/Dig-for-words and you will be put in double for the drawing. Hint about my give away; I do like arts and crafts.
The Ancient One spends too much time on Facebook. But every now and then something happens that makes it all worthwhile. A few weeks ago I received a "friend request" from a woman who wondered if I was someone she knew many years ago when our families were friends and near neighbors. As soon as she mentioned her maiden name I knew who she was; I had not seen her or anyone in her family since some time before I left Detroit nearly 50 years ago. I accepted the friend request.
and didn't know what was happening.
Even though the earth be removed,
We've taken this month's Travel Moon to Paris and Sacre Coeur ...
Nonjatta geeky note: The kanji used for this whisky's name (膳) has no link to Zen Buddhism. I have a feeling many foreigners would assume some kind of connection. From a Japanese perspective, though, calling a whisky after a religious tradition would be a bit odd. Not sure how I would take a Scottish blend called "Calvinism", come to think of it.
In comparision to probably my favourite liner, the color is very similiar, minus the glitter.
She was the sweetest baby I had ever seen, and my heart filled with joy instantly when she was born. It was an unexplainable wave of love that came over me, over us. It was this shear joy, this shared connection. This powerful thing that meant that she looked to us for her needs to be met and she trusted that we would meet those needs and just that wide open trust and love. It was boundless love. I still can't get over that. My brother, when we called him, he said, doesn't it feel like your heart just quadrupled in size? And he hit the nail right on the head. That was really it.
"It's not important."
On February 7 Pennsylvania Governor Tom Corbett proposed his 2012-13 state budget that cuts PASSHE (including West Chester University) by $82.5 million, cuts grants and loans for students (PHEAA) by $27.2 million, and cuts many other educational programs from pre-kindergarten to Ph.D. candidates.
This book has been the biggest influence on my writing this year. It has helped me use the rules of grammar to strengthen my writing style by showing me when to break the rules, and when to keep them. It has helped me form stronger emotions and settings through adjective use and descriptions. As I write my own story, this perfectly crafted book sits in my heart and whispers in my ear. My muse for a season.
Father: "Hmmm. That's strange. I could swear I saw her name in the bridal announcements last Sunday. It must have been a mistake, although I thought I saw her the other day having dinner with an older fellow. Then again, the hair wasn't the same."
We went first to the Yarnhouse, which had a sign that looked more like “Yamhouse.” (To me, a specialty shoppe featuring sweet tubers was only slightly less likely than one with yarn.) The front door opened onto a narrow retail space jammed with tufts of thread, knitting needles, four middle-class ladies slumming for crochet supplies, and one actual male hipster manning (I use the term loosely) the cash register. The only redeeming features I could make out were a sign on the wall claiming the business had free wi-fi, and a half-box of Dunkin Donuts, leftovers from an apparently retro grand opening ceremony held earlier that morning. Other than that, it was fiber arts as far as the eye could see.
Too bad we had to come home to shovel 20" of snow....
5. WorldNetDaily: Overlooking the Fact that they have Chimpcoulter writing for them, I like the non-partisan coverage that Worldnetdaily delivers. They expose the evildoers and have opened up the truth of what is happening at the DOJ with the corruption of Alberto “The US Constitution is Quaint” Gonzales as well as exposing the Orweillan plans to issue fourth the Amero and the North American Union in order to completely destroy the United States work base. America needs more non-partisan news.
12. My mother taught me about HYPOCRISY.
"Both attacks were suicide attacks," said the police chief of Charsadda district, Nisar Khan Marwat.
* Sounds of the most romantic of the romance languages
When most people think of tall buildings, they think of their appearance from the ground, foreshortened. Professionals (A/E/C) tend to think of their appearance as they look in renderings: isolated, head-on. My favorite view is one they I only get once in a while: when I’m at the top and look out, seeing the few tallest buildings projecting above the forest canopy.
Music and tv get so boring after awhile.
She reported to the receptionist who told her to have a seat. She wanted to take out the pamphlet, but she thought it would have looked weird. The picture nagged at her. Was that really a picture of what was inside of her? Or was that a fancy Photoshop job? The answer seemed trivial, as the abortion had to take place. She was reluctant to let second thoughts stop her, but her mind couldn’t let it go. Could it be that abortion really did kill?
I absolutely loved Kate in this dress. The newlywed looked dazzling and pristine. The lace sleeves made the dress look elegant, while the bodice gave the dress a modern feel. What did you think of Kate's dress?
I don’t care how she’s hurt me. I will love her for all time. I only wish the best for her. She says she cannot come to me yet. She needs to find the “courage”. Whatever that means. Am I being stupid? Am I pathetic in her eyes to continue to hang on after she’s ripped my heart to pieces 3x?
We have hosted over 75 work parties in our 10 acre parcel of urban forest in the last six years. We have painstakingly picked up invasive plants and planted more than 1500 trees and shrubs. We have written for and received grants to fund an urban forest trail system to connect neighbors and neighborhoods. I have sat in Council members chambers in City Hall sharing our story of forest transformation and restoration. The heaven that I thought was just one-shovel full away has taking me years to begin to see. I have leaned on that shovel-and on the arms and hearts of committed neighbors and friends-in fatigue and frustration, wanting so badly to be done and to realize the destination for which I had set out for…so very long ago.
Granted, a dog or some other animal could have dragged into my yard from someone elses, but this wasn’t just your garden variety underwear, as it was adorned with sequins and tassels and was rather lavish and upmarket, as far as underwear goes. I cannot image a stripper hanging her tools of the trade out on a clothesline, but hey, you never know. I checked every day for a week to see if a matching bra showed up, but it never did.
We observed the Winter Solstice earlier this week, and today, we're baking cookies and pies and other yummy things for the first of two Christmas feasts this weekend.
Disc Seven (2006): “Talk to Her”
around your heart
ARTY 5/10
The significance of public space, in light of the recent wave of revolutionary protests across the globe, goes mostly unappreciated. While the majority of media’s attempts to unravel the events have focused on social, economic and political analysis and the widespread use of social media, few have considered the integral role and function of the public space itself as a key player in the revolution and democracy itself.
and this man will have no guilt, shame, or fear,
But yesterday was different: I felt myself descending into sleep and not the REM kind, the deep, slow-wave sleep that, I’ve read, hits you when you first fall asleep. I remember seeing something dream-like, a vision of myself doing something that I can’t remember but that was no doubt Jungian. And poof, a light and a milky void where I understood everything and had all knowledge and experience at my fingertips: My mind was open and I was seeing it and everything I knew with a clarity that is impossible. Naturally, I panicked, as all I could see was a milky white expanse that I somehow knew was the shape of a brain and all I could fathom was at my fingertips but somehow incomprehensible. I started hyperventilating and kicked myself out of the sleep. I sat awake with my heart pounding and discerned what had happened.
It’s why we’ll jokingly tweet or Facebook, “Headed to church, LOL…gonna get my worship on.”
Some assembly required: Start with the healthy part as the foundation on your plate. Then add dressing of your choice (last night I added some bbq sauce to ranch dressing and we spooned that over the top of the greens). Next comes the steak, then top it off with the french fries. Tuck in your napkin, grab your knife and fork, and enjoy!
It’s no longer the Germans I'm worried about.
In this video, they claim the Police were “hurt” as the supporters were crying out these words “Polis” and “Anjing”. Notice they were crying these words at the K-9 unit truck of PDRM ? What would the K-9 unit carry in their truck , lembu ? Kerbau ?
Yoga
So you can see from this mamoth post that there are lots of things to think about, and just choosing one background is going to be very tricky. Well good! You should mix around and change things depending on what it is you're shooting. Not only to best showcase your item, but for interest's sake. Using 3 -5 different backgrounds will 'break up' the monotony of your shop front and keep things interesting. You can see in my shop that I have largely the same backdrop, but I've changed around the stack and made some pages more dominant in some shots. This makes things cohesive and interesting at the same time.
So are you ready for this fortnights challenge? .. This fortnight we welcome to "Team Trace - Julie, Kasey, Eva Marie and Siv... cant wait to see what they do for their debut.. no pressure guys! So onto Challenge 44... All about the boys!
Hollywood greenlit a crappy movie that should be burned even before it is filmed. Again nothing to do with politics, just a daily fact of life.
Please use Inlinkz to show your creations and take part at our challenge. Please link directly to your post, not only your blog. It would be nice, if you leave a comment, too.
the holy catholic Church,
I'll be right back.'
No WIP as I finished all my DT cards for the next week so I got my Christmas papers out and my huge packs of photos from this Christmas, think a layout is on the cards for today!
There are key ways in which most of us do not have the means to (media) production – from our inability to understand how to do anything but use (as in use as a consumer) the shiny computers so many of us carry around in our pockets, to more economic or legal issues like the one Martin Robbins recently flagged up on his post about web hosts as the Achilles heel of online journalism.
Today will be such an exciting day because we have the RA Banquet and the theme is hollywood. This means I am getting super dressed up today! On top of that my boss is working tonight and I made over one hundred cookies last night to bring around to public safety and the other RA’s that will be on =).
~Karen Shortcake Mauro~
Dear Starbucks,
Faust never lets up. The action is relentless and no matter how over the top and stylish, the emotions ring true. She is able to give a tongue-in-cheek delivery without being out of character. There is an undercurrent to her writing that seems to share her love of the genre with the reader. It’s like she’s whispering “Isn’t crime fiction cool? Look what you can do with it.”
The cars polished carrying fashionable passengers
A moth flew into lunch today. He said, "An omen." His hair is brown and his skin is white with small yellow dots like confetti on his shoulders and a few on the tops of his cheeks and along the bridge of his nose. Something so changing as a man's face. I looked up at the moth and thought. "Transformation," I said, and he agreed.
The only saving grace about kegging is that it is quicker than the Colin Farrell sex video.
It was different for me...
I went to a higher dosage of lexapro last week (from 20mg to 30mg) and I don’t think it’s working. I’m just more tired all the time. Starting the day is harder. It’s weird, because it feels rather like being happy and sad, at the same time, all the time. My uneducated opinion after this higher dose trial is that the tiredness and lower mood I was complaining about were mostly due to medication side effects. (The psychiatrist did tell me, when I was switching from zoloft to lexapro that while zoloft tended to make you hyper and insomniac, lexapro made you tired.) To be fair, there has been some added stress lately at work (like my employer screwing up paperwork which might force me to not work while the situation is resolved). Combine that to the side effects and I think we have a cause.
2) Australians, like the Honey Badger, don’t care. They aren’t afraid of things. They said that, in Australia, everything is so highly regulated that there is an underlying cultural assumption that nothing will cause them harm because everything is so inherently safe. They’ve convinced themselves of this to the extent that, even intellectually knowing things in foreign countries may be different, they straight up don’t care.
Besides his remarkable good taste and talent, he is an extraordinarily nice guy. His services are complimentary; you can stop by, but if you'd care to make an appointment you can ring him at 816-274-3217. (You might have to get in line behind me.)
Basically, I think the point I'm making is that Republicans are in a catch-22, and are probably going to lose the election. I don't know much about Rick Perry, but I find it hard to imagine that even if the guy is a great campaigner, and can play moderate for the Independent's sake, that the country would be willing to throw out the current intelligent, moderate, professorial president we now have for another governor from Texas.
I was given Allingham’s archive by Joyce Allingham and have spent years cataloguing and trying to understand it. Writing his biography has challenged almost every one of my assumptions about literature, authorship and relative cultural values. Rather in the same way that e-publishing is currently forcing so many of us to think again.
Say what you want about American Idol, but the original singing competition is still better than poor imitators like X-Factor and The Voice. And it’s not all American Idol’s fault, The X-Factor and The Voice just have way too many flaws as TV shows. We’ll see how Simon Cowell fixes the American X-Factor for its second season, but for now let’s talk about how to fix The Voice:
A year ago today Ms. Ruby pranced across the threshold and became the official embodied dog of Roxie's World, ending fourteen months of terrier-free living (if you can call that living) for the Moms and more than three years of confinement in a Missouri puppy mill for one of the sweetest critters on dog's earth. (You can read Ruby's story on the American Fox Terrier Rescue website, and don't worry -- There are no horrifying words or pictures that will ruin your day. If you love dogs, terriers, or this humble blog, you might even consider making a donation to support the work of AFTR. Just a thought. That's what Moose did this morning to celebrate the anniversary of Ruby's adoption.)
Sunday, we woke up late and headed out to breakfast. The place we went to was pretty tasty and (from what I can gather) rather popular in Tulsa, because there were no seats in-doors so we sat outside on the patio. My food was excellent but the patio was steamy and I think it affected my brain, because I have absolutely no idea what the name of the restaurant was. Fail.
1 can diced tomatoes, drained
Who screwed Colonel Jairus’s daughter
- swearing / c word
55 degrees at 6am. An overcast day, I love overcast days. Tom Bevacqua said "rain on and off all weekend including Sunday, still notably chillier than usual." This is the third coolest May in the last hundred years.
"Here is a little lesson on how you can take a pattern and make it your own.
I don't have a brother, but I would like to stretch the meaning to be able to extend this lovely tradition to my family and friends. I hope the bracelet's appeal and symbolic meaning captivates you as it has me.
Stamper Gyrl!
are excluded from the church.
2 plum tomatoes, cored, quartered
But, considering it’s an interesting sales move. I thought I’d attempt to apply religion to some other companies, you know: To help. So, I will end this blog with a few of my own advertisment slogans for other companies.
Sound Quality: A in OU's rating and ears....
So, I gave it some good 'ol Kara lovin. I sanded the edges and took my foam brush and put some stain on it. Yeah yeah yeah, you're supposed to stain, then apply poly, but I've never been one to do things the right way anyways!
Simon points to the powerful meat lobby and its stranglehold on our collective food conscience. She argues: “One way to distract attention away from heart attacks and colon cancer is to conflate the idea of meat with a nutrient that we do in fact need: protein.”
On top of that, the endings of each story will definitely surprise you. To get the most out of each story, and of the book as a whole, you will need to re-read once or twice (or, as in my case, a good four or five!) to get a grip on whether or not what you think is the end is properly the end. You will also find many concepts and themes are turned on their head, and I guarantee that you will not be disappointed, even if you disagree or dislike the open-ended nature of the stories and chapters. It is perhaps hard to express and explain this more without spoiling a short story, and that is something I refuse to do… just prepare yourself for some unique takes and viewpoints on a few well-known historical tales, as well as some original stories.
As will the repeal of the smoking ban, so sign that one too, if you haven’t already.
Enjoy the catalogue and hopefully I might see you in London, if nothing else it is an excellent chance to see some of the gallery artist's best work in the "flesh" and have a chat and possibly a glass of wine. I love doing Art Fairs and am particularly proud of my flipping catalogue!
Today “the preaching of the cross is to them that perish foolishness.” They laugh at the gospel of God’s grace. They say, “Christ died for our sins, Have you ever heard of such folly?” But God’s Word is true and from it we read this eventuality from Philippians 2:10. “That at the name of Jesus every knee should bow, of things in heaven, and things in earth, and things under the earth: and that every tongue should confess that Jesus Christ is Lord, to the glory of God the Father.”
As we got older our tennis shoes were put aside for high heels, we traded in our Vaseline for anti-aging moisturizer and our fighting days are long behind us (unless you count kickboxing at the gym). However, we can still whip our earrings off in a moment’s notice if we sense danger. If you ever saw "Star Wars" think of it as an ‘urban’ use of the force. In other words - - If Luke Skywalker had an African American half sister. He would reach for his light saber when he sensed danger. Luke’s 'sister' would go for her earrings.
Last July’s rally, more than 10,000-strong, ended in violence when police fired tear gas and water cannons at the yellow-shirted protesters, drawing criticism of a heavy-handed response and sending Najib’s popularity sliding. His approval rating has since rebounded to 69%, according to one poll.
Saturday Jordan took our seven roosters to be slaughtered, so they are now snug in the freezer along with Mr. Hog who met his fate a couple of weeks ago. They will be joined by a 1/4 beef later this week! Ahh....lovin' that, but for some reason I am having trouble getting inspired to write a menu for this week.
Okay, maybe a re-phrase: What is it about a book you enjoy that makes you want to share? It doesn’t really have to be good, as long as you liked it.
It seems to be in the nature of human beings to argue. Children may argue with friends over who got the biggest cookie or who gets to play with which toy. In some cultures teenagers argue with parents about how late they can stay out, and where and with whom. Co-workers may argue over work assignments. Friendships,love affairs, and marriages are sometimes broken up by arguments. One of the best pieces of advice I was ever give is that it is fine to disagree, but try to disagree agreeably.
Bred with with Flat racing, rather than a tilt at the John Smith’s Grand National, in mind by Paddy Kelly of Ballybin Stud, Tharawaat was sold as a yearling for 100,000gns to Sheikh Hamdan Al Maktoum, who stands his sire Alhaarth, a top-class juvenile, under his Shadwell banner in Ireland. Tharawaat’s dam Sevi’s Choice, by Sir Ivor, was a winner on the Flat in Germany and is from the maternal family of champion European sprinter Committed. After five unsuccessful outings on the Flat at two and three for Barry Hills, the Sheikh cut his losses and sent Tharawaat back to the Tattersalls sale ring, where this time he joined Michael O’Leary’s string for 28,000gns. He made an immediate impact in his first season over hurdles, progressing up the ladder from a maiden win to a Grade 3 victory. He was runner-up in the Grade 1 juvenile contest at Leopardstown’s Boxing Day meeting and was in front when falling at the last in the equivalent Punchestown contest the following May. He got off the mark over fences at Down Royal as a five- year-old and won once more in his novice season and again in October last year, when he took a handicap in heavy ground at Galway. His best effort in a chase probably came in defeat next time out, when he was third in a Clonmel Grade 2. His year-younger Galileo half-brother Galileo’s Choice has also made the transfer to jumping, winning at Fairyhouse in February before his seventh place, as favourite, in the Supreme Novices’ Hurdle at the Cheltenham Festival in March. Race Record: Starts: 21; Wins: 5; 2nd:
Crooked Arrows: A story centered on a Native American lacrosse team making its way through a prep school league tournament.
Run to You
A- If an actor is “attacked” with that state, it will always be effective. (100%)
Yes, if you don't change things now then you will have a good life. You'll get to travel the world a little bit, you'll have a home of your own, a wife and a son. But you will not be true to yourself or to anyone else. You'll spend a long time being who others think you should be and not who you are.
I've loaned him out to vendor booths at events, and we frequently do fund raising for various groups. When we work the Houston Eukanuba Shows, he's sometimes able to pull in several hundred dollars a day laying on the ground. The last time we attended the show, we earned 98% of what our rescue group got all weekend long. Mouse and I: 98%. Six other people and four dogs: 2%. Yep. I think he has a great method down. My dog is a remarkable oxytocin machine. He is available for rent and for social media consulting.
I have been to places and times that I will never visit. I have met cultures that I will never meet in person, but am now aware of. Worlds, thoughts, stories and discoveries contained between covers, are free to roam in my imagination.
The Murano glass technique is world recognized and wonderful but due to the crisis they are hard to survive and opting for new other income. I hope they recover soon and would love to see their more articles in future.
Notice the baby’s white hair, too:
Then the grass was painted brown
Life is Sin.
One day while strolling through Goodwill looking for a dress to wear to a wedding, I saw…. Could it be? After all these many months of searching? My eyes zoomed in on the mug of my dreams….
Album sleeves were art.
I suppose, sometimes, the journalling just gives you a bit of a kickstart down memory lane and to also help re- evaluate what is really important in life :-)
Overcoming these challenges and finding a way to develop an effective mobile strategy is a top priority of insurers. We expect there to be a learning curve for adopting mobile technology, but it is undoubtedly an important platform for the future of the insurance industry.
His running away from Battle field (or) His stealing butter. The so-called flaws in Krsna’s character are displays of transcendental variety in His pastimes.
Today I got asked if this meant the house was going to be sold and everyone move over here
Soft music, tasty hors d’oeuvres, the warmth of the fire, and conversation with good friends primed us for a delicious, gourmet dinner prepared by our hosts. In the oversized dining room, MaryBeth had set a cozy table next to a window, overlooking the bay.
the two grounds of denial. If CSIR HQ did not have the information they could have just transferred the applications to their subsidiaries BUT instead they first came to a conclusion that all information pertaining to the terms of the licence was confidential, thereby ensuring that none of the 39 laboratories would share any information with me. Then, in contravention to Section 6(3) of the RTI Act (which requires a ‘public authority’ to transfer applications to the relevant public authority which has the necessary information) they cited a DOPT circular which allegedly does not require them to transfer the RTI applications to all their subsidiary labs. The underlying objective therefore was to make me file 39 different RTI applications with each of the labs, then receive 39 different denials of information from all 39 CPIOs because the CSIR HQs had already deemed the information to be confidential. After receiving these 39 denials, I would have to send out another 39 appeals. In short they wanted to make sure that I would not get any information.
The earliest Dutch settlers related the Namaqua people’s own claim that they were descendants of a shipwrecked Chinese junk which had rounded the Cape. Some of the traditional huts occupied by the Namaqua people resemble the traditional yurt from China. There have also been speculations that the pure Bushman language had at least 20 syllables that sound and mean the same in one of the Chinese languages. Authors such as Laurens Van Der Post, in ‘The lost worlds of the Kalahari’, 1958, also describes how the Bushmen in Africa are the descendants of Chinese people.
Another aspect I could not get over about this painting is that all I can think about is Baked Beans when I see this. “Honey, cook up the beans!” I’m not sure if it’s due to the timing of the painting or if I have somewhere hidden down deep inside an automatic connection between farmers and baked beans. I am not a fan of baked beans. The only thing that is good about baked beans is the Bush’s Baked Beans DOG (and dogs do not remind me of baked beans in any way – dogs, good. baked beans, bad).
Born in a package that the world perceived as male, anatomically correct and everything, it was impressed upon me from the start and onward that I was this. Males are this, and as I was “male”, I therefore would also be this. Having nothing but my own deep thoughts to counter with, I got with the program and bedecked myself with those male mode impressions until they became second nature, no matter how uncomfortable they might be. Fortunately I was raised to be chivalrous and protective of women; it could have been worse. On the flip side I felt the need to adopt an interest in sports, cars, action movies and other subjects I found crushingly boring, but received social cues that I was expected to be knowledgeable about. Now I’m attempting to undo all of that and it’s not so easy.
Maybe it’s just me, but isn’t the card game, Old Maid, just a little politically incorrect these days? I mean, I couldn’t care less, but aren’t we making fun of an older lady who has never married or had children? The shame. Another name for an old maid is a spinster.
could take the strain:
The White Ribbon
…to feel accomplished when pulling up the bathtub plug with my toes.
I am not sure why the spaceship-like things had come to Earth or where they came from or what they wanted or if they killed people or if they collected people or if who ever was inside them wanted to live on Earth after clearing out humans, I have no idea, but it seemed that many humans were gone and/or in hiding.
To do this Void Ray rush, it is necessary to scout the opponent and at the same time try to prevent his ability to scout you. Scouting is the key to this strategy. When the enemy Probe gets in your base early, send a Probe right away to chase it. When you have Zealots, block the choke. (Or defend it with Cannons.) For your own scouting, since gas is going to be the more important resource, it would not hurt to warp in a Pylon or Assimilator inside the enemy base, just so you know what’s going on for a longer amount of time. Building Assimilators in the enemy base is even stronger for the Void Ray rush: you at least delay your opponent’s ability to gather gas. And if you delay your opponent’s gas, you also delay his ability to build Stalkers or Stargates.
I want to share this story that blessed me.
Let me also say that Tommy Dreamer still has a place in a Wrestling company, and he can do alot for Fortune, and I hope that is what happens. At the end of this feud, Fortune must put over, or this means nothing. I hope that is what we see.
And so the frog proceeds to gobble up various creatures that increase in number. From a tick to five slimy snails. Yet that half-sunk log isn't what it seems, and when it suddenly rises, showing eyes, and jaws, the frog loses his lunch as they escape while he hollers.
We should all find a way to do something nice for each other and someone and it doesn’t have to include money. Just think what a great country this could be if everyone did something nice no matter what color or race you helped that day.
“tongue roll call cadence, hear the school bell ring“
I have given a link to an online seller for each text, not for reasons of endorsement but simply to help you all find them easily. Some of these may seem a little expensive but are often available as used copies online or your library will be able to get hold of them for you. Hope this is of use!
Bench: Home Goods, recovered with laminated fabric
Some channels which also have newspapers broad-casted the event and then written about it in their papers shamelessly the next day saying, it's an offence.
Art. 25 (Investigation report) After the final stage of the investigation, the case-handling staff should submit a case investigation report, explaining whether the relevant activities violate the law or not, and putting forward suggestions for process, and relevant facts, grounds and basis, as well as including the complete evidence materials.
Speaking against the backdrop of two armored military vehicles, one draped with an American flag, Obama said that he just signed “an historic agreement” with Afghan leader Hamid Karzai outlining a new, post-war relationship between the two countries.
Even in the worst of traffic, Samatya can be reached by taxi from Taksim Square in 20-25 minutes and around 17 lira. We spent around 55 lira per person and feasted like kings. It is a truly extraordinary place, rich with tradition and people from all walks of life. If you have a spare evening in Istanbul, do not leave without going to Samatya for a meal of mezes, fish and of course, Raki.
‘Among all the dumb things said about the so-called Arab Spring last year, perhaps the dumbest was the idea that the new democracies of the Arab world might follow the Turkish model.
And with that I was led to the first chair and then immediately surrounded by a gaggle of cackling old bitties, three young wide-eyed teenagers and one young ex-Marine with a "I love doing hair" tattoo on his left bicep that greeted me with a wide grin and a strong nod. "Howdy, ma'am!" he said.
. . . guiding you?
85% of small business owners believe that the economy is under a desperately wrong track under Obama. Think about that figure. Think about how many liberals also try their hand at small business; and think about the fact that nearly nine out of every single ten business owners see disaster in everything Obama has touched.
But I know there’s so much more
I’ve been doing some thinking about some running related posts that I would like to share over the next few weeks in addition to my marathon training progress. Since this will be my first half-marathon, I am definitely learning as I go, so why not share it? I am not an expert, and do not pretend to be, but rather hope to share what I learn and perhaps excite, inspire or motivate others to give something new a try. Believe me, running and I have had a love/hate relationship in the past, so if I can do it, so can you!
When I see other nerds coming out of their shells and being proud of who they are.
This recipe produces 20-25 Latkes depending on size of choice.
PS: As an aside, I visited my post about 4 hours later, and the Advertise products Gadget was there! So, I selected a product and added it to this post!
Alas, the Lad was Very Tricky
Catherine’s thoughts: Holy crap, the holidays are going to suck being alone. What DO the lonely do at Christmastime?? Cry into their eggnog, probably. Thanks to Jeff for the tip on this one.
Sgt. Pepper probably marked the beginning of the album as an artistic expression of its own, rather than just a collection of artistic expressions. The less nuanced approach was to put the most radio-friendly songs either at the beginning of side one, or the beginning of side two, or somewhere on the first side, as far as I can tell from checking the track lists of my pre-1967 albums. (this continued after Sgt. Pepper as well). Some bands still just put their most likely hits first, and pad out the rest. This is less forgivable than ever before, now that iTunes has rendered album filler obsolete, and extra annoying.
Now as 2011 draws to a close we are having a break and shall return with our New challenges 15th January 2012, there will be some new releases too. :)
hmmmm.. quite tough there coz it has been a while since i've been in touch with the science in normal life.
Having said that, there are some points that I agree with. For public schools. Homeschooling is quite different. One of the first points on their list of bad is that year round schedules offer too little, too late in the form of intercessions for students who are falling behind. If you’re talking about an over-burdened public school system where teachers are paid very little to do a monumental job, then yes. I agree. But for homeschooling students, intercessions aren’t needed simply because a parent/teacher is going over each concept and working with his or her student until he or she grasps the concept. There’s no push to keep ‘on schedule’ or worrying about keeping up with the faster learners. Their solution is to have the child attend Saturday classes.
There has been much to-do in the drinking world about a certain aspect of the upcoming James Bond film, Skyfall. The problem, it seems, is Bond’s choice of a Heineken beer rather than his traditional “shaken and not stirred” martini, which many consider as both an egregious affront to the character’s legacy as well as an another all too common and unfortunately heavy handed example of product placement.
On 11 September 2003, the article appeared in the Femail section of the Daily Mail. I’ll reproduce it here – what was printed, along with what actually happened.
Think again, long and hard, about what the federal government does. It:
When I was in Paris on the Left Bank for several days, my sister and I stayed at a pension where at the doorstep, there was a neighbourhood morning market with an abundance of freshly baked bread, fruits and vegetables. Of course, we went to the famous Dutch cheese market at Gouda, in the Netherlands, where costumed teams of 2 cheese-bearers hauled around large orange cheese rounds on cradle flats hung from their shoulder straps.
“This is where the manufacturers have an opportunity because technology and the middle market go hand in glove in terms of solutions,” Hughes said. “That’s not to say that State Farm should take agents off the street—because I think they’re our best beachhead to serving the middle market. But it can help others who say their cost-revenue analysis doesn’t support face-to-face assets in front of the middle market.”
The one I've been in love with for years....
or call 585-275-2917 today!
14 Queen Bitch
REVISION
...I’ve written about my inner Foul Mouthed Grand Inquisitor...which works better, for me, than inner critic...most likely because, given the time I’ve spent as a professional literary critic, and around them, the image of some musty academic surrounded by dusty piles of books and reminder cards for therapy appointments, unable to say anything without citing a pile of jargon-laden articles from journals nobody reads, fails to embody the kind of fear involved...
If you have a problematic skin only the BB Cream won't give a uniform result. In these cases, you can use it as base and retouch critical areas with concealer or foundation.
Las Vegas was never on any plan I’d had regardless of who’s doing it. I’m probably one of three people in the world (me, my mom and my dad) who have no desire to ever set a toe in Las Vegas. So it held no interest for me at all.
Its frustrations and passions were kept at bay by force and draconian legal sanctions, foremost among them capital punishment and transportation to the colonies.
Sorry to disappoint.
Upon a ridge he rested as he went along his way When all at once a mighty herd of red eyed cows he saw A-plowing through the ragged sky and up the cloudy draw Their brands were still on fire and their hooves were made of steel Their horns were black and shiny and their hot breath he could feel A bolt of fear went through him as they thundered through the sky For he saw the Riders coming hard and he heard their mournful cry Yippie yi Ohhhhh Yippie yi yaaaaay
